Article 36: The administrative punishment resolution should be handed over to the parties on the spot after proclamation by the copyright administrative management entity. If parties are not present, it should be sent to the parties within seven days.
I absolutely adore my new necklace given to me by my lovely friend.
I was just surfing the net thinking about some recipes I have had on my "must try" list for a while.
Not that we should judge, of course. The desire both women have to marry well makes them no different from thousands of other females populating the silent screen, and the realms of theatre, literature and legend for centuries before that. Those women never said they were marrying for money, but the men they won were always well-off. Even Cinderella had it both ways, and you couldn’t blame her for being pleased about it. Pink differs from Ermintrude, and all the rest, only in her self-reliance. Yes, she wants a man’s money, but she’ll determine how he gives it to her.
I love her best of all:
But the demise of that 'corporal' thing,
There are plenty of Scriptural warnings about these spiritual deceptions. For example:
Another proposal was made to build a City Hall Annex and parking garage at Ninth and Colorado. Other proposed sites for a new City Hall were between East Fifteenth and Sixteenth, San Jacinto and Red River, or off Riverside by what is now called Auditorium Shores, or at the site of the Austin Colosseum and the Disch Field Stadium (the latter was being demolished in 1969). Still another plan had the new City Hall complex spilling onto either side of Congress from Colorado to Brazos, from West and East Second Street and up to West and East Fourth Street.
A Silver aide contended another section of the law - barring the release of information constituting an "unwarranted invasion of personal privacy" - justified Silver's refusal.
We started moving into a temporary room at the dorm my husband works at. Our actual room is getting renovated and we’re told that we can move in within a month. Knowing how slow things get done at the university, I’m guessing it probably won’t happen until August.
On cool spells
Suaram has also proposed a number of witnesses the courts could subpoena, including Prime Minister Najib Abdul Razak, who was deputy prime minister and defence minister at the time the purchase was sealed and current Defence Minister Ahmad Zahid Hamidi.
In terms of placement, line-breaks and isolating individual lines has a psychological effect on the reader’s pace; a visual species, we learn to associate the spacing out in the plane of the page with the spacing out of events in time, as typographical cheats such as increasing the kerning will demonstrate:
Another shelf contains a half-dozen volumes of DC’s Plastic Man archives and a couple of The Spirit (which tells us Lethem is both wealthy and a man of good taste), along with a ton of Kirby and a bunch of Fantagraphics’ Complete Peanuts volumes.
And triumph we do, after weaving our way in and out of the extensive printed maps and GPS satellite coverage. The parking sign is a beacon in the darkness, calling us forward to meet our collective culinary fate.
born: 1787
I should know that by now.........right!! lol
1 A.M
And along the Strand, up Queen Victoria Street.
A moon-lit pass that only she would know,
The next morning I found her in the bathroom sobbing. I didn’t have to be told why she was crying and I went to my knees as she sat on the toilet lid and promised that I’d never do it again (although secretly I was thinking that next time would be different – I just wouldn’t get so drunk). And I meant it – I truly did. It was a promise I made over and over again for many years.
A new photographer is born! Miss fuji!
IS THIS YOU? WHAT WILL YOU CHOOSE?
New Address
108) I am a very fast reader. And I can read upside down or backwards writing faster than most people can read regular writing. I also invented my own phonetic alphabet, that was based on the English language, when I was about 12, so that I could write in code. I had a nosey brother.
Shoes and Jewelry from Saks Fifth Avenue Off Fifth
This journey of transformation has no road map. It’s calling us to turn within and activate our intuition, our inner compass, our inner guide. For when we access our inner GPS, we are guided along every step of our journey and shown where we need to be and what we need to do. The answers are within.
Mama say stay away from that girl
It needs to be done in a quiet way, not in a way that detracts from the situation.
· Room Cleaning (FINAL)
Darkness Before Dawn is a fresh new story with captivating characters, unexpected plot twists, a fascinating setting, and a compelling voice. Written under the name J. A. London by a talented mother-son team, the trilogy is perfect for fans of True Blood and the House of Night and Morganville Vampires series.
Good for 5 Years. Next up: Mooi & Meedogenloos (Beautiful & Ruthless) - a 10.2% Belgian strong ale. Premiant and Saaz (again) hops used in this devilishly dark looking beer. Big foamy head which disappears quite quickly after the pour. Aromas consist of bananas, bubble gum and Belgian yeasts mixed with a bit of light toffee and fruitcake. Dry and rich. Hints of roasted malts, not as much Belgian quality as I had thought I'd get - the dark malts really push the body forward through a big carbonation. Earthy coffee and some chocolate sweetness. Dry peppery finish, but no real alcohol presence - these De Molen beers really know how to hide the percentage well! The threesome is really getting into full swing now...
On top of all this I have boxes, yes, actual boxes full of china and glass in the garage. I also have another dresser, from my mum's, that I am going to paint, (when my arm is better) so I can stand it in my hallway and put all this boxed up stuff on. I've started to feel a little bit mental.
orange zest
- Energy: you might not read this elsewhere, I believe resilience is just as much about the body as the mind. You’re health and wellbeing will significantly impact you ability to be resilient – so balance sleep, nutrition, exercise and relaxation.
“For the death he died he died to sin, once for all, but the life he lives he lives to God. So you also must consider yourselves dead to sin and alive to God in Christ Jesus.” Romans 6:10-11
Often I am enmeshed in a 700 page book on the tank battle at Kursk or a 400-page biography of Alan Turing. I read such books, as I said above, cover to cover.
Seven Things About Me:
My obedience trainer at PetsMart won’t let us use the word “NO” because up here in WI a favorite catch phrase is “you know?” and dogs can’t tell the difference. Having just finished edits for my upcoming “Dust of Dreams” (sheesh, I just typed “Drams” – what am I, a time-traveling apothocary?) I can tell you that I apparently have other “favorite words” that appear in my manuscripts on a fairly regular basis. The reason they do not appear in my BOOKS is because of a long-suffering saintly editor who has a highlighter and is NOT afraid to use it.
and just up the street in San Francisco, California
The Mayans, like the Greeks and Romans, worshiped Gods. Worship was not only part of their spiritual life, but also had a big effect on many other aspects. For example – construction. Stairs going up the temple were purposely constructed to be very shallow, forcing the people to walk up and down the stairs sideways. In doing so, you could never turn your back on the Gods, nor could you look at them directly (suggesting that you are equal).
Well, I have actually messed it up the first time... For some reason I decided to keep them "fresh" by freezing them. Don't ask me how I got that idea into my head, it's stupid.
Gotta go. My cat needs me.
Don’t marry her. Buy a house.
And yet, there’s always a back story.
Initially, the old mule was hysterical! But as the farmer and his neighbors continued shoveling and the dirt hit his back, a thought struck him. It suddenly dawned on him that every time a shovel load of dirt landed on his back: he should shake it off and step up! This is what the old mule did, blow after blow. “Shake it off and step up… shake it off and step up… shake it off and step up!” he repeated to encourage himself.
Panicked, I said, "No, not your best friend Amy!"
Fall Branch Falls is off the beaten path, but we got to the trailhead without too much difficulty. The hike itself was fairly short and very pleasant. We got to the viewing platform and had this beautiful waterfall all to ourselves. What a wonderful way to break up a trip.
Today's question comes courtesy of Debbie Mihalik: How do you get your creative groove? The following is the first of four posts to answer this question.
MM got her baccalaureate degree in both Religion and Studio Art, graduating Summa Cum Laude, Phi Beta Kappa from Hunter College in New York City. Her website, MYSTICMAMMA.COM, is pioneering a fresh and contemporary vision by presenting ancient wisdom and leading-edge thought
Conclusion: Whilst the two (only) options I had were very tasty, I just don’t see the point in coming back, theres there’s nothing on the menu…nothing to tempt me back (I’m the only veggie in the family and as the only one with dietary needs it’ll come down to where I can and can’t eat..). lack of choice basically means I won’t be coming back to this pub, we might check on the menu after a few more visits to hawkshead this year to see if there is any progress or major changes. I think to be fair the final nail in the coffin came when my child’s meal was brought out it was £7.99 for a two course meal, the first, chips, sausage and peas; was standard size for a kids meal, but to follow it up with a kids “Punky The Penguin” Ice Cream Novelty toy worth about a quid, with less than 10p’s worth of ice cream in it felt insulting – I was sure McClure’s haven’t stocked these in years..apparently they are still around. A plastic toy (useless) with barely any ice cream in it smacks of not caring about the customer and then slapping a price tag for a “two course” is just sickening. Either take the price of the kids meal down to a reasonable £5.95, or get that stupid novelty off the menu and offer a better, proper desert that’s had some effort put into it.
Warning! This book is addicting. Once you start reading it, you won’t be able to stop!
Serve hot or cold with Cream or Ice Cream or on its own with a dusting of Icing Sugar
That poor man is the most self sabotaging man I have ever met. He was gung ho in this job that he has when they first transferred him to another department. As long as he gets pats on the back and is the center of attention, he is happy. But then, it happens that things quiet down and you start to see the decline. He does things self consciously that brings about either failure or downfall of some kind. he no longer cares about getting to work on time. He will never care about that unless there is some girl there that grabs his interest and he wants to talk to her. He has NEVER wanted to be gung ho about supporting us for me. He only does it because he has to. He’ll do it without giving me too much of a hassle if there is a love interest other than me. (that doesn’t make me feel isolated at all)
I’m gonna breathe slow
La Strada, which I’ll admit I love, and the
Sweet! Here we go!
How much alcohol am I allowed to drink before I do that? I hate mirrors with a passion and avoid them at all costs - hence my usual dishevelled appearance, no make-up and total disregard for myself. Mirrors in supermarkets and department stores should be banned.
We are part of a generation diagnosed with a major case of relational ADD. I understand I’m making hasty generalizations, but tell me if you don’t believe it as truth. We think we’re really involved but yet it’s so easy to back away and find the next best thing.
Denise would argue with her mother that she never complained about how she was treated as a Cinderella and how she never cared about her and only her golden daughters which began to cause more tension around the sisters.
Okay, don't say "Ewww beets!" I know that beets are a love them or hate them vegetable. I have a strong opinion about those who dislike beets, but have only experienced beets from a can or a jar. You cannot officially say you don't like beets until you have done two things:
Feel free to add this information with website where ever you think it will help.
I can tell by the way the phone rings it’s someone asking for a political contribution. And it’s not someone whose philosophy I agree with.
Can't wait for the album.
serrano margarita
This is totally different from the legitimate reasons to be judgmental. If you smoke around your kids, I am going to judge the hell out of you, because you are full of suck. If you leave your kid in front of the television for hours so you can gossip on the phone with your cousin, I will judge you. If you leave your baby to "cry it out," I will judge you, because it is proven to harm children, period, full stop. If you hit your kids or verbally abuse your kids, I will hope you land in the hottest corner of hell. Oh, and I'll judge you. Oh yes, I will judge you.
Wives and Husbands
And the best part? Serve them to your kids, to your husband, to your company but don't tell them about the black beans! Let them ooh and aah over how incredibly chocolately they taste and then, if you want, hit them with the truth and watch their reactions: What? Black beans? Like in enchiladas? Huh? Nah, you're joking! Can I have another one? :)
Pour a few tablespoons of olive oil in your crock.
Patterns from the Sixties and earlier were usually sized for a specific waist measurement (usually within two inches, e.g., 28-30). More modern patterns tend to include S-M-L-XL and you cut the size you need.
And the years, passing by,
He ducked his head and flattened his ears.
The ABC get a bit of a free pass in the media because there are bigger, noisier targets out there; Channel 9 is a fat mess, Channel 7 is obnoxious and Channel 10 always seem to be in the midst of ratings trouble. The problems the other networks have are sexy and easy to talk about. Ten’s a sinking ship, Seven has a cavalcade of plastic, irritating “personalities” ripe for mockery and Nine is always only a week away from a massive flop. The ABC have a different, unsexy, uninteresting to write about, problem and that is they are living in the middle-of-the-road and nobody is saying anything about it. The ABC want you to believe that their most exciting new show of the year is a comedy quiz show about words called Randling.
Branch County District Judge Brent Weigle set a $10,000 bond for both but released Crocker on his own recognizance. A preliminary exam is scheduled for April 25.
I was contentedly nursing my son when I suddenly heard Lena scream. I couldn’t imagine what was wrong. I jumped up to go to her and saw her shaking her baby wildly. But the baby never cried, no matter how hard she shook him or spanked him. Suddenly, she broke down, hysterically screaming out “I must have rolled over him in bed and smothered him.” I went and picked him up. He was cold and stiff. His life was gone!
The reason I have to forgive myself for this nasty habit of mine is that, while it’s second nature for me to just walk away from whatever it is at some point, a few weeks or months down the line it almost always starts to cause me some degree of guilt – I feel like I have betrayed myself, and usually with good reason. Of course, if I could just stop doing it in the first place, I wouldn’t have anything to forgive myself for, but if it was that easy to stop doing, I wouldn’t keep doing it… would I?
Holy cow. What a whirlwind of a week. Because I'm a hardcore procrastinator, I ended up staying up way too late for my little self pretty much all week trying to finish up all the birthday party stuff. Hence my lack of blogging the last few days. Three days in a row without a blog post. I'm pretty sure that hasn't happened in quite some time. No worries, I've got some catch up to do, so I'm sure I'll make up for it with my post count in the upcoming days.
Tsingtao 5
“How do I get that job?”
Two stages feature live music from bands including Blitzen Trapper, Denver, The Dimes, Quiet Life, Weinland, Tango Alpha Tango & Violet Isle, The Ty Curtis Band, Matthew Price, Jamalia, Ben Rue and Tiffany Kuenzi.
Thanks, Kimberly, for tagging me. This was fun. Again, I am bad at tagging people so if you're reading this and want to participate, consider yourself tagged. If you do it, please let me know - either here in the comments or send me a message on twitter @fishgirl182.
I have learned this the hard way in my own life. Yup you heard it! I have been on a two year journey of teaching myself to let go and declutter. I used to hang onto too much stuff. The problem is, I like a lot of things! However, I have slowly been learning the art of saying "no" and "letting go".
Provincial Potentates income which is also $0.00 per year. So the next time
1/2" PVC Pipe
Visit Magpie Tales for our image prompt. This week’s image is a painting which continues the vein of surrealist images in which Magpie has been indulging. This one is going to drive me nuts because of its title? artist? It’s not a surname… Head over to see what we have.
Now we know the timetable for the ballot of UNISON members in Health in relation to the Government's derisory "final offer" on pensions (http://www.unison.org.uk/asppresspack/pressrelease_view.asp?id=2643) we can see that timing truly is everything.
-addendum: iPod just switched to Elliot Smith; Miss Misery is the first track. Gotta love being in synchronicity with life, the universe and everything. Say isn’t Towel Day coming up?
We strolled around, the buildings are just above a lovely river with a small waterfall. They also have a striking view of the Pambre Castle. (We´ve been to the castle and frankly, it needs some work. But then it´s really old.)
“And if you look at the far right in this country whether it is the British National Party or English Defence League, they are very clearly targeting the British Muslim community. And what is quite worrying they are now beginning to form small groups of minority groups within the EDL to achieve their objectives of creating divisions within the Muslim community.”
I purchased my 1st batch of Lily of the Valley stamps this last week or so also that I cant wait to play with after I get them and some other new girls and some Easter stamps.
Blow by Blow
I'm just hoping that we get into the house before Ian arrives. All of his stuff (crib, changing table, clothes, food, diapers) is all set up in the nursery, while all of our junk is still over here! My baby's got a nicer pad than we do at the moment (and less dusty/piled with boxes).
*turns radio back on
Rich and I respected each other and didn't judge each other. He was far from perfect and so was I. But we just blended so well. He taught me so much about how to love and not be afraid to let those innermost feelings out. I was so guarded because I'd been burned by my sons birth father. I kept thinking the other shoe was going to drop. Finally, I got the message that this was true love and I could let it all hang out. I taught him what it felt like to be loved. He was orphaned at 2 years old. He never had true love. Even
It has also been an eye-opening discovery of common plants bulked up on clean mountain air. When we lived in Florida we were amazed how you could discard a bit of houseplant only to find four months later that it was making its way up a tree with now plate-sized leaves, or find a 20 inch trunk on a pencil cactus you’d previously witnessed to be no bigger than a pencil. What I’m talking about however is not that Sunshine State steroid fueled type growth, it’s much more, what, country? Rural? Unfettered? Whatever it is, it always takes us by surprise. For instance: One of the first trees to be freed of vines was a huge pine right outside the deck/kitchen side of the house. It too is across the property line, but hangs over into our yard. We have been homeowners often enough to know that when you move in you need to wait a year to see how the light falls before you start planting. So here comes the height of the first summer, and we noticed beautiful clusters of white berries hanging from the high branches of the pine. Gorgeous cascades of tiny white globes in grapelike configurations. Hum. We followed the berries to the vine and then on to its leaves and …poison ivy. Holy shit. I’d never seen it bloom, much less bearing toxic fruit. It had to go. We consulted with various agencies that offer gardening and nature advice and this is the method we have struck upon: cut the vine as close to the root as possible and paint both ends of the division with a Roundup-type poison. This method is our one concession to a totally organic ethos. There is no spraying, but a specific generous application to the wound. And it is extremely effective.
Then the peaceful realization got born within me. An organically and naturally grown little glimpse of the meaning started to breathe. The title of the first chapter of Jack Kornfield’s book A Path With Heart came to my mind, the crucial question that has been with me since I have read it in his book a long, long time ago: “Did I love well?”
This is trunk #2 in my attempt to save the ugly old trunks of America...for some reason I have a whole trunk collection piling up in my garage. I don't have a particular love for them over any other pieces of furniture. I have at least 3 more that I know of that need some love (if you could see my garage right now, you'd understand why I said "that I know of"). So, to recap - Trunk #1
one for the other friend you brought along,
and fully got wayward and went totally awol. “
or weary
Being part of the motorcycle community gives me this warm feeling that I can ascribe to that same feeling of being part of a family. Despite everyone living their own lives and riding on to their own goals and driven by their own motivations; you know that the community tries to look out for everyone’s good. It’s always great to be part of a family.
On Tuesday, May 1, 2012, a man was walking along Highway 11 near the Delavan-Darien High School campus.
Jai Hanuman! Jai Sri Ram!
Of course, at the heart of the Basic Program experience has been the challenge of reading again and again the best of the intellectual heritage of the West. These are texts that one should be challenged by every time one returns to them.
And of course that brings us up to date with myself, Dayne, Forest, Matthieu, Violaine and new comer Caitlin watching some crazy ass fireworks and drinking Aquavit in Oslo Norway which I'll write about in a separate post.
Sommelier Larry Stone was the first American to win the title "International Best Sommelier in French Wines and Spirits" and remains the only American to have earned the title of Maitre Sommelier from the Union de la Sommelerie Française. He is also an English-certified Master Sommelier, one of a handful of people who passed the exam on the first attempt. Today he runs the award-winning Rubicon Estate in Napa Valley (www.rubiconestate.com) and is working on his own wine label, Sirita, named for his daughter. Larry loves Provence and so I asked him to tell us five of his favorite local vineyards.
Blake's passion is photography. This isn't something I'm familiar with from a technical point of view, so I was a little concerned I wouldn't understand all the terms. But I did and the photography aspect ties in so well with the rest of the book. Especially when it comes to Marissa, Blake's best friend. She lives a very complicated life and Blake wants to help her however he can.
March 5, 1773:
At least for most of the year, until the faces begin to sprout the first tell-tale signs of Movember and character is celebrated once more. For every upper lip concealed, Movember reveals much about modern man, testing him in ways he is seldom tested in these times of peace of comfort.
We should have listened to Dr. Woodson, Malcolm, Martin, and Garvey – and if we had we would know that we are better than that. And that’s my Thought Provoking Perspective…
“I wonder if you would consider refraining from putting online until we have had the opportunity to complete the COPE guideline-based procedure? I feel it is important that the authors have the opportunity to respond before it goes into the public domain. I realise that there appears to be a very clear case but they should have an opportunity to respond as indicated by the COPE guidelines.”
Check out his blog and see what he has to say.
Torpedo Extra IPA
Till Tomorrow!
The Courier-Journal reported a week ago that five members of the Tolling Authority a 14 member group named by Kentucky Gov. Steve Beshear, Indiana Gov. Mitch Daniels and Louisville Mayor Jerry Abramson, have ties to The Build the Bridges Coalition through organizations that serve on the coalition’s board.
Today, we have three SCACD designers showcasing some fabulous new stamps! Here's my sneak peek... It's my current fave stamp!!! Butterfly Dreams by Carmen Medlin for SCACD.
affirmative
Prehistöricos formed during the summer of 2010, when actors Tomäs Preuss and Jessica Romo merged their musical ideas to create a collection of acoustic songs about teenage love. Their debut album La Orquesta Ocúlta ("The Hidden Orchestra") - released last October and available for free download here - received great reviews, focused mainly on the bright and naive nature of their repertoire. Mentioned in many Latin American media 'best of the year' lists, this duo are one of the highlights from a growing list of Chilean pop bands.
Do tears ever catch you by surprise?
Next, prepare the salsa. Boil the 3 ears of corn in salted water for about 15 minutes. While the corn in boiling, finely dice the onion, peppers, and tomato and combine in a mixing bowl. Finely chop the cilantro including the stems and set aside. Combine the remaining dressing ingredients. Once the corn is finished cooking, let cool for at least 10 minutes. Cut the corn off the cob and add it to the pepper and onions.
Lyn was next to arrive with a really lovely 'cupcake' card. Very clever touch to make the icing from felt and carefully sew seed beads on as 'sprinkles' too. A lot of work went into this card Lyn, and the result is great - hope the duster brush arrived OK and that you're now 'pouncing onto the ink pad' with it and dusting away! Cupcakes are always super on cards and this one is no exception :)
I can’t wait to upload my photographs. But those of you who had been following my adventures know all too well that the next two weeks is going to be very VERY busy for me as I am campaigning with my own political party in the UK Local Elections. I hope to win a seat on the City of Edinburgh Council and put a stop to the Edinburgh trams farce by replacing it with my own piggyback to work scheme.
And I just agree. There was no other line that represented that young and fresh mixture of various trends and future styles better than the duo's former baby.
Everyone seems happy with their gifts, Santa and otherwise. Except maybe me. I was hoping for an iPod Touch, but I don't think Santa had it in the budget this year.
Perversely, the exorbitant pricing schemes drove people to the domestic draft taps, where beers were cheap and extremely tasty. There was an 2008 imperial stout from Stone aged in Elijah Craig barrels that they were giving away for $2 a glass. Lompoc's 2010 vintage of Old Tavern Rat was a mere token (pint price: $4).
Denza – Bravehard (Festuca Remix)
And the White Horse looked on.
A lot of these black guys, they didn’t know white guys. They couldn’t tell that I was running scared. I made them nervous. This mutual distrust affected the way we understood each other – and the way we acted.
"I can remember arriving on that first day, carrying our bags and hand-held belongings, toiling down the path from the walk above the Boat House. The pathway to the Boat House was too narrow for a car so we carried our bags over the uneven surface while we looked over the low cliff wall at the sand and water beyond. ... We walked laden with bags and books along the last stretch of the path, rough and natural under our feet, to our new home, a three-storeyed
I am well. I am responding from a cafe in Cambridge, MA. I am out on tour with another songwriter named Pj Bond and we are in the last week of a three week tour. How are you?
Family Work
With this bunch of bozos in Washington running our big businesses into the ground, small business is going to be the only financial engine our nation will have left--so let's make it happen.
Usually these games are just a giant build up to be a giant let down. I’ll go to the game, but I’ll be reporting live for the podcast later as well from CitiField. I’m looking forward to that. The game itself, I’d much rather stay home.
Of all the stupid, misguided truisms of advertising, the one that is most thoroughly destructive is the idea that advertising is a "young person's business."
Of course the whole thing started off with this very special invite.
Learn more from the AZ blog, it's worth checking out, plus you can find out more about Plain Wrap who are keeping me in stitches these days now that I found their whole record. The T.P.U. demo is included in the download as well. The links below are to download direct from that blog. If it doesn't work for you let me know I'll try and upload the files I got.
Discussion References:
I grew up on a small farm. Eighty acres is not much, but it was enough to sustain us. At least when we added the 500 hogs that we raised. I've always wanted to return to the farm. It was a lot of work, especially as an only child, but it all seemed so much simpler, closer to the earth, and natural rhythms. I know I can be accused of romanticism here, but there is truth to the closer to the earth/natural rhythms piece.
Having now pedaled much of South America my teacher pet of choice is the same as the Teacher on Two Wheel’s: Bob. Monosyllablic name, scary left hook.
5. Be One Now
Shawn just posted a few new sketches on her blog. I can't wait to use them, they are awesome! Go check them out here.
Gabriel is officially a rake. He’s spent his adulthood flitting from ballroom to ballroom managing to capture the heart of many a youthful debutante and the bedroom of many a widowed Lady. But with the purchase of a country estate Gabriel is ready for a bit of quiet amongst friends for the holiday season.
The weather has been somewhat cooperative too- no snow, no ice, not even much wind here in NJ lately...just plenty of sunshine.
So now, just because we can, we kill people without discrimination or identification based on patterns of behavior. Just who authorized this in Yemeni government, or is the only sovereignty we respect our own?
His answer caught my interest. I pondered that story and its implications for several months. Then, as I was preparing a sermon, “The Crisis Called Christmas,” my thoughts came together. I used the Walters story in the introduction to set the stage for the idea that each of the birth narratives called for a response-or a reaction-from its participants. When it comes to God’s intervention in our lives, we can’t just sit there.
"Acting doesn't have anything to do with listening to the words. We never really listen, in general conversation, to what the other person is saying. We listen to what they mean. - Jack Lemon
"There's a sense of war in Iran, people fear that war is very, very close. Some people are going to the supermarkets and stocking up on supplies which they are keeping at home in case of war," he says.
“You and your superstitions.” said Rachel.
4. Are you seeking your ambitions or your spouses? At the end of the day most marriages look like this…one person has given up his or her dream for the other person. They put their ambitions on the back bunner, and here’s the reality…most people will hold resentment as a result. Men… 9 times out of 10, your spouse is not that interested in watching you do something like fishing or playing video games. She may say with a smile on her face she is…but she is BORED out of her mind. Women….men don’t want to want to do the dishes. When both spouses are seeking each others ambitions its amazing how those ambitions seem to open up to Jesus. Your spouse is your help mate and you have a purpose that Jesus has set before you. Always remember that.
I do not think Dan Bylsma was out-coached, as the team was failing to implement fundamentals in Games 1-3. They were not playing, as Coach Disco likes to say, “Pittsburgh Penguins Hockey”: Get the Puck North, Keep the play in the Offensive Zone, and Grind Those Bitches Down.
FATS DOMINO
The Moors are outside Oviedo.
Leong charged that the police furthermore overstepped the ban order by closing roads beyond what was stipulated.
I can’t wait to read on and find out how horribly wrong I am!! LOL
"Errr..." he stutteringly starts, "There has been a change of policy at Starfleet. It has been decided that no redundancies will be made at all. You will all remain in your current positions. Sorry for any difficulties that arose."
Wondering how one can say ‘i love you more’ to the face
Ladies, here's a word of warning based on research in male washrooms by a male colleague in BsAs. Regardless of the appearance of your dance partner, washing your hands (especially your right hand!) before eating is strongly advised.
7) A female character who has no flaws
Physical Demands:
This prayer quotes the words of the centurion who asked Jesus to cure his servant. He would not presume to ask Jesus to come to his home. He trusted in the authority of Jesus’ healing word, saying: “Lord, I am not worthy to have you enter under my roof; only say the word and my servant will be healed” (Mt 8:8; see Lk 7:6-7). This new phrasing reminds us that, in receiving Holy Communion, we are to emulate the centurion’s humility and faith.
Little Boys Play With Dolls
All showered and refreshed, we start dinner preparations, or until Murphy reared his ugly head-news: the BBQ does not, I repeat, does not run off the propane tank we had filled in the RV; we also have no connector! Oh well, sandwiches again! Thanks Murphy!
Authority and power are two different things: power is the force by means of which you can oblige others to obey you. Authority is the right to direct and command, to be listened to or obeyed by others. Authority requests power. Power without authority is tyranny.
Kavita was left all alone to die, but her grandpa was kind enough, he started to take care of her. Her father met with an accident in which he lost complete control of his mind and became bed ridden for many years in an invalid condition and lastly, he too died.
They couldn’t go real beefy with the surround because I wanted a DEEP mantel and enough space around the fire box to install tile. So in order to make that work, the sides were a bit thinner, but the molding and mantel were chunkaaaay.
Luckily we didn't scare him away and we will have a regular Farmer's Market on campus every Wednesday. He promised local Johns Island tomatoes next week and I see Tomato Pie in my future.
leaving you in the woods, your legs squeezing trees,
To even help out flow – the colours could be used in bolder applications. Like on turnstiles. There are of course two side point issues with what I’m about to suggest. 1, the TTC is generating revenue from allowing advertising on the turnstiles, and 2, that some of the turnstiles are bi-directional (it is Canada after all). I would offer up the following solution. That turnstiles be colour-coded with their directional purpose – green for entrance and red for exit (we can even have those words on them as well). Beyond that I would suggest that they do away with the entrance/exit version. Mainly because it sets up a confrontation – not unlike a stopped escalator, who has the right-of-way?
I love owls. I consider myself lucky when I get to see one. They aren’t a popular bird here but we do have them. One always appears in the same vicinity along the river. It sits and watches the cars go by – safe on its perch atop a fencepost. It is massive and regal. I sigh when I see it and smile.
The Angel says, “Please tell me how you died.”
"Should I advertise my balls?"
2T brown sugar
There are several versions of this going around, and all are funny.)
The random winner of orders of $25 or more placed in August is:
If 2009 won’t be remembered for the frequency of tropical storms, it could most likely be recorded as one of the wettest years, so far.
“What about that song “I believe?” Said Ted.
1. The Greek “Great Chain of Being”
James died following a stroke in September 1701. Louis XIV wasted no time declaring James Francis Edward King of England, Ireland and Scotland, a move that irritated King William and Queen Mary. Scottish Lord Belhaven was sent to France to request that Mary agree to her son’s conversion to Protestantism, which the Scots believed would enable him to take the throne after William’s death. Mary wouldn’t hear of it, though they did agree that, if young James became king, he wouldn’t meddle with the Church of England.
I did go on to have two daughters who bring me great joy.
After teaching, I was more than ready for breakfast. I actually prepped myself a bowl of overnight oats last night so that I could eat right away when I got home…but Brian ate it! He thought that I made it for him…I honestly didn’t mind too much that he ate it, but I make my oatmeal a little different than his oatmeal. He doesn’t exactly like it when things taste “healthy” and I do. Oh well!
Relient K
- Make sure that you sign up, and have it posted by 00:00 on the 12th December
如果，我们正视面对
The next morning, Pete and I got up at around 7:30am while the others still slept, we went for a walk/hike around the area to take in the views and explore a little. Hahaha Pete even went for a naked run! Literally he goes “Ever been on a naked run?” I said “can’t say I have man.” He goes “Okay” then drops his pants (leaving his running shoes on haha) and sprints off into the distance! I fell over laughing, I was not expecting that first thing in the morning. We started to get hungry so we walked over to the bar where the band had played the previous night. A local family owned it – Mum, Dad, 5 daughters and 1 boy. The eldest was about 11 or 12. They had some awesome stories to share with us about the people who travel through there and they hoped that we’d had a great night. They cooked us up a huge breakfast, Pete and I split a ‘Mountain Man Omelette (the most enormous omelette known to man) and a Breakfast Burrito big enough to feed 3 people. We sat and shared stories while we ate our meal – took us a good hour or more to get through it – I ate half and saved the other half for Blake cos I figured he’d be hungry when he woke up. But Pete had made an announcement to the whole bar that he would not leave his stool until he had finished the entire meal (something that had apparently never been done before). And he did, he had to take a few breaks and get a pep talk from me at one point but he finished the whole thing!
I spent an hour this morning categorizing all the transactions and revising the budget.
As for the atmosphere, you can see from the pictures that it's relaxed and an attractive place, but for me it was all about the DJing and about the way you felt taken care of and even your stuff was treated with respect. I actually felt that the culture of the place was genuinely with me and behind me in expecting me to dance only if I actually wanted to - and that it was all about attracting people who would actually want to dance with each other. Genuinely and collectively behind me, and not the usual lip service. No need to fuss or talk about manners. It was lovely.
Oh, and as an added bonus, here's an updated (and much better) picture of my TH/SS Terminator Marshal. He's been done for a while, but it's one of my favorite conversion pieces.
We were trundling up this mountain, you see: me behind the wheel, my long-suffering wife riding shotgun, Brandon and Megan in the back and loads and loads of luggage. The weather is so variable we didn’t know what to pack, so to be on the safe side we took the lot. Bikinis, parkas, hiking boots, flip-flops… So our lumbering old van weighed around 4.5 tonnes. And the mountain we were climbing was a 1 in 8 gradient.
I really enjoyed getting to meet performers from outside of GTB and everyone who competed was incredibly friendly. I was amazed to find some of the biggest, baddest, hottest people on that stage are the most soft-spoken backstage. This was a bit of a change from working backstage with the geek girls: generally a whirlwind of red wine, body glitter and schemes to marry Chris Hardwick.
Malaysian police on Saturday fired teargas and water cannon as crowds of protesters demanding electoral reforms surged into a central square in Kuala Lumpur, AFP correspondents said.
Summers are always so exciting! We get to sleep in and have lazy schedules and we don't have to fight the clock. We do fun things and get a little learning in to. Mostly we get to have fun with our family and friends and down time! Can't beat that! Here are some fun times in pics... our friend Ryan's b-day party, water play in the back yard, painting, tons of legos, going through the boys art work from school, lots of Wii, sleepover, Colton and Kasey meet a squirrel, Sonic run, Star Wars cookbook cooking, many trips to Chick-fil-a, endless Scooby Doo videos, Jump N Jungle, Children's Museum, YMCA splash pool, Apollo 40 anniversary at the Space Center, beach, camping in the living room, serving others, Jumpin Joeys, and San Antonio vacation with the Swiggards...
the blue eye of Amun-Ra
"We should condemn ghastly acts of awful cruelty but we must, as they say, hate the sin and love the sinner, or hope that he may change for the better."
Ah, village life.
To me, Richard Louv’s Nature Deficit Disorder isn’t just a concept, it’s an epidemic .. and I utterly concur that one’s mental, physical and spiritual health is linked to an experience of nature. Or as Rachel Carson so eloquently put it, “Those who contemplate the beauty of the earth find reserves of strength that will endure as long as life lasts.”
Whiskey Sour by J.A. Konrath – I just finished this one not too long ago (see my previous review!) and although it may not have the same feel as a math-based murder mystery, I thought it was a great read!
Universities Week 2012 follows a successful campaign in 2011, which saw 110 universities and 52 renowned ambassadors take part in showcasing the work of the higher education sector.
TheAlmighty @noah Big enough for 2 of every creature on earth. No time to waste.
Want some candy, little girl?
Band Aid - Do They Know It's Christmas - 10 Million
It is not possible to explain your thoughts or feelings without language, which is why the elites are reducing vocabulary so we can not think the wrong things. When the state controls thought and language we are controlled in our ability to think as was demonstrated by the descriptions of Newspeak in Orwell’s 1984. They use linguistic connotations like “racism” which only applies to “White” or “British”. They are also cutting education down so that we don't know our history and where we are from and so that we have less knowledge to argue with.
And I'm also looking forward to the new How To Destroy Angels album, supposedly due out this year. Trent has even said that he's considering doing more Nine Inch Nails music as well.
Unity Stamps: Iron Orchid Designs - Carte Postale (Postcard, Bird)
It is appalling to hear an American citizen joyfully proclaim, "I don't gotta worry no more about food and gas prices. We done got Obama an he's gonna fix it for us."
Without a whole lot of further ado....
Posture, of course, for me. Always posture. Slowly it improves, but as I dance I always feel it's wrong, know it's wrong. I think we learn to live with these curses a little more, as our tango maturity develops. We figure out that we can't worry about all our inadequacies all the time. If we do, we dance like robots, constantly correcting ourselves. Overcorrecting ourselves. Forgetting the dance itself. We get lost in the technicalities.
One night of the Open Frame Festival put on by the very wonderful Room40 and Laurence English. If any recordings require headphones these are them. Noise cancelling are best. I have a pair of audio-technica ATH-ANC7b and they work a treat.
Amongst all the hysteria with Tupac being resurrected to take to the stage at Coachella 2012, Dre and Snoop managed a full set list performing back to back classics being joined on stage by the likes of Wiz Khalifa, Eminem and 50 Cent.
It’s interesting how as soon as Judy finished her internship she left the hub of London and moved back to Scotland. She has since set up her own studio space in Edinburgh and is establishing herself as one of Scotland’s best up and coming designers.
So would we do it again? Most definitely; I'm not a resort-only type of person who can spend all day by a pool but definitely enjoyed the change of pace and the convenience of it. Ideally I'd mix these types of holidays with more adverture/exploring ones, probably "harder" with children but still near and dear to our hearts (and hopefully LLC's if she gets a taste for them growing up). The only thing I would reconsider is taking a short haul night flight home – after a long day we were all tired but the environment didn’t invite rest and I quickly found my zen state fading fast. The forever learning curve continues.
Swap Super Carriers for Consort Carriers? Smaller, harder to hit and practically uh, bulging, with unmanned naval aviation drones - dozens could be constructed for the price a super carrier
Who knows what the year will bring...
Keith smiled uncertainly, confronted by this vision of pink. He held out a bottle of Chateau de Supermarket, uncertainly.
In various states of undress
So my day started with sprucing up my home. I hate cleaning. I have cleaned so many homes in so many years that if I ever move from here, I am never going to live in a big house in the suburbs. I am going to live in an okay size home where I have less cleaning to do and more to enjoy. So whenever in the past if we have lived in big cities we always gravitate towards suburbs where there are better schools but then we always end up with less diversity. So lets if we go to Chicago and FJ works in the downtown hospitals, I am going to get an apartment near the hospital, visit Devon street a lot and eat a lot of Pakistani food rather live in some suburb and have FJ drive 1 hr to work. My kids are homeschooled anyway so it doesn’t matter if the public school system is not good. I am tired of the lack of diversity at where I live and really wish to live somewhere where I don’t appear like an alien. Where did Chicago come from? It seems the moment we are thinking of Pakistan, FJ is getting offers from all over…so lets see.
But which one do you know?
While the tree and light were front and center, the storm clouds overhead and Colorado River below made excellent background complements I knew I needed to include. I started by aligning myself with the tree’s branches framing the Colorado. Moving as far back as the terrain permitted, I zoomed to fill the frame and compress the foreground/background distance. With a 67mm focal length, depth of field was tricky. My hyperfocal app told me that the hyperfocal distance at f16 was around 30 feet, meaning if I focus 30 feet away, I could be sharp from 15 feet to infinity. I refined my composition, removed my camera from the tripod, focused on a tree about 30 feet away, returned the camera to the tripod, and clicked.
It was made, entirely unironically, an artist friend of my mother’s, and she sold a number of them before (I suspect) the Disney corporation came hard down on her ass for copyright infringement.
Today I was stood up twice by people who wanted to meet with me to get help with their spiritual life. I saw both of them on Facebook as I was waiting on them to show up. A couple that wanted help with their marriage was supposed to meet with me today, but they had something come up. Sure, these can probably be explained, but it does make you wonder about our priorities. The Bible says to seek first the kingdom of God and His righteousness and then all else will be added to it. Somehow we think that we need to get everything else in order and then find time for God.
May the mind and spirit of Christ be in us, directing our minds and actions, so that we will become the persons you intend us
MUFE Rouge Artist Intense #45
a rotten tomato that when placed with the good ones
The Wicked strangers
J for Jason.
Above are two pictures of Al’s team. The picture on the left shows his team in their dragon boat. Al is the one looking at me with his paddle up. In the right photo he is the team member kneeling on the bottom left.
Only you can decide what to give God today or it would not be a gift. What can you afford to sacrifice to God? What do you need? It is usually the best place to start. Don’t worry about what others think but give what your heart is holding the tightest to lest it becomes an idol standing between you and God. When you think of giving what do you fear most? Give it. Then you will receive God’s Answer that conquers all fear. You are not emptying your life as a sacrifice because Jesus did that. You are simply making room for the Blessing of God to fill your life to overflowing with His Abundance reserved just for you! Say with me, “I will give ________ today!” In no time, you will change your tune from “What Have You Done for Me Lately” to “Look What the Lord Has Done!”
After making payment,
I've been meaning to do a post on Monica's shop. Got to do that because it is the teensiest, tiniest, cutest little flower shop you've ever seen.
The hairs raise on their arms as they approach the statue, is is sheathed in electricity. Arcana check reveals that thievery will work, he can take -4 penalty to skill check and do it without touching the damaging electricity, or take the damage and get take a check without the negatives. he takes 4 points, and diverts the energy into the ceiling, the trap is disabled for 24 hours, while it recharges. The party can safely exit the far end. This success was the 3rd or 4th, maybe even the 5th.
citrus
PIPA and SOPA were opposed by many Internet giants including Google, Mozilla, Facebook, Yahoo!, Wikipedia and Reddit. Google organized a petition against the legislation, while Wikipedia held a 24-hour blackout to protest the bill in January. As a result of the action, SOPA was recalled while PIPA was postponed indefinitely.
Cardigan: H&M.
GK: I don't know. That is a business question, which is best directed at Les Goodstein at News Corp.
“Pretty sure he wasn’t thinking about vengeance,” Manny replied.
This is hard! - The paths to glory often leads through suffering and difficulty. It's much easier to measure how many people attend, than to measure how people are growing.
What I did really enjoy about this book was the road trip itself. They’re driving a classic clunker, they sleep in camping grounds and in the car. They eat from gas stations and convenience stores and Peter counts his pennies at every stop. Plus the dog they picked up along the way does add a nice touch of character to the trip. I felt the road trip was quite realistic in terms of their ages and their capabilities. I also really, really enjoyed the way that Smith writes dysfunctional family relationships. I really did believe in Emma’s isolation and Peter and his father’s fractured relationship and inability to really communicate with each other. I felt that I could understand why Emma never knew about her twin and even though I felt for her, and felt that it was wrong she didn’t know, I could also understand why parents and children old enough to really feel the loss (her brothers and sister were in their mid to late teens at the time of her and Thomas’s birth) could clam up about it and just find it easier to never have to talk about it.
Apparently, the CFO wasn’t the only one to feel this way because when I cme in the next day with my hair curly again, my boss told me that I should consider chemically straightening it; otherwise I look like I’m in a perpetual state of bad hair day.
to go; but why tap out this
On the 21st of March 2012 angered members of the Malian army surrounded the Presidential palace in the capital city of Bamako. The next day their spokesman Lieutenant Amadou Konare announced that President Amadou Toumani Toure had been ousted. He also anounced that The National Committee for the Restoration of Democracy and State (CNRDR) formed by the Army had seized control of the Country. This was not first time the ousted President had been involved in a military coup.
“I always really liked building things,” says Joel. “I found designing satellites and other spacecraft interesting simply because space is such a rigorous environment to operate in. To fly in space, you have to fly at over eight kilometres a second, in no atmosphere, in hard radiation, where temperatures can vary hundreds of degrees from the sun to the shade. It’s an impressive design challenge.”
“What is it that makes people back home* have no respect whatsoever for rules, laws, or even their fellow human being? Why do we come here and feel (for the most part) respected, and why are people so much more willing to do the “right” thing, follow the rules, stand in line, take turns, stop for pedestrians?”
I finished a really awesome book, which was so riveting that I had to keep telling The Boy to be quiet and leave me alone so I could finish it. I know he thinks I am mean/antisocial. I normally don't read scary books, but I could not put this book down. And it's the author's first novel. He really hit this one out of the ballpark.
Theresa spent all day in that kitchen, rolling dough with a broomstick before cutting it into pasta, and cooking sauce with tomatoes picked from the vegetable garden in the tiny backyard. She worked vigorously making meals well into her 80s.
My wife and I became seriously involved/obsessed with the saving of our own vegetable seed a few years ago and have experimented with collecting seed from almost every edible plant that we have grown at one time or another, mostly with great success. Because it can be, and has become, such an immense project to save all of our own seeds we have decided to focus the majority of our efforts going forward on the crops that are most important to us, the core crops that we could not live without. Vegetables like beets, parsnips, carrots, potato tubers, turnips, tomatoes, tomatillos, cucurbits, onions, beans, peas, celery, corn, peppers, lettuce and other greens like parsley, kale, and various types of chicory all make the list.
I'll be posting my favorite links ups from last week on Sunday..
The smith and thee gat roaring fou on,
Important: If you want to insert a blinking button, simply go to your template exactly the same way. When the dropdown menu appears, do not look to insert a "picture." Instead, take the html code from the button that you want (you will see it underneath the blinking button on the person's blog) and then insert the code under "HTML." That's it! In other words, you still go to "Add a Gadget," but you don't enter it as a picture. The drop-down menu has an option of inserting an html code for it instead.
I share these with you because I am looking forward to how these goals and dreams will bleed into this blog. I hope that my recipes will be more meaningful and full of life. I hope to be inspired so that I might bring more hope and inspiration to you. Making each day count. Making each effort of healing worth it.
Q: What do you mean by absent? Are you going to abandon your blog?
Then my sister phoned. Her best friend, and friend of mine, had lost her husband... but let's go back a couple of years...
That is, the Jews dared to not accept his sacred words and adopt his new religion – Islam. We also have some classics of anti-Semitism in this passage. Or, should I say, that they became classics precisely because of passages like this. So not only do Jews dare not to accept Muhammad as the voice of God on earth, they also practice usury and ‘cheat others of their possessions’. But weren’t the Jews pushed into usury because other religions didn’t allow their believers to practice usury (or lending at an interest)? Thus the Jews were the only people who were allowed to practice usury and banking at this time and after (as was the case in Christian Europe).
Although the facts surrounding the case in Florida and the case in Georgia are quite different, both involve a claim of legally sanctioned self-defense, a dead young black man and, for the Pattersons and the Martins, deep concern that race played a role in the deaths of their sons.
Today is a busy day for us. Corbin and Zoey had a dentist appointment this morning. It was Corbin's 1st cleaning and he did very well and even let them floss. Zoey also did well and this was her first time to the dentist. She let the dentist check out her teeth and rub some fluoride on them. They won't actually do a cleaning until she's a little older.
It really is very handy to have a bit of topiary around for displays as it gives a bit of body to the whole display and adds a bit of a green counterpoint.
Cool zig-zags were everywhere. Chevron and flame stitch patterns were present on a number of very cool chairs. This one from Thomasville definitely stood out. The colors are soft and neutral, making this chair all about the pattern.
* Might it be that what really ruffled feathers here was a very pertinent dig at a very silly idea? ‘Fab City’?! That wouldn’t come from the same bright spark who thought ‘Cool Britannia’ was a winner, by any chance?
Do you own a sunscreen? Let me know what you are using!
distancing themselves from the fears of the day
DW: Holy crap!
Samuel is eating a bit better and finally drinking. We are seeing some self-soothing behaviors and sometimes he is most comfortable in his crib (thank goodness the hotel had one), which quite honestly is really hard for me. It is a harsh reminder of where he has spent many many days. Let me just be frank, I don't care how "okay" a baby house or orphange looks, IT IS NO PLACE FOR A CHILD!!!
Well...this is definitely NOT what I wanted to share with you today...
1. Read good books of all kinds, but mostly fantasy, and primarily Diana Wynne Jones when in that category.
We asked him if it was just a bad batch.
Mikkeller To From: 3.40 Mugs
All of which leads me to add 2 + 2 and end up with 7.
“OK, let’s go look at the Passat again.” Paul said, and just like that the vision faded.
Cricut Gypsy
Start a Team: If you choose to mentor others to become Stylists, you can dramatically increase your earnings in addition to earning commission on the jewelry you sell. You not only earn commission from your team’s wholesales sales, but you can earn residual income from the people they mentor, too. Because the more we support one another, the more successful we all become.
“Light & Luminous,” In India Minal the dance instructor desperately wants to win the contest, but upsets her students as she acts the diva instead of the mentoring teacher.
Today, the city is planning to demolish the Frost Memorial Tower, unless the building first collapses under the weight of this winter's snow. Yet despite the destruction caused by three decades of abandonment, the Frost tower has remained an iconic neighborhood presence. "Activists say the building is one of the most important, beloved, and beautiful buildings on Staten Island," according to the Staten Island Advance, and several Staten Island groups have worked towards preserving the building. These include the Coalition to Save the SI Castle and the Preservation League of Staten Island, which has led rallies, organized a petition, and started a "Save the Castle" Facebook group. The New York Landmarks Conservancy has placed the Frost Memorial Tower on its Endangered Buildings Initiative list, but notes that "despite repeated requests for evaluation, the building has not been heard by the Landmarks Commission."
Hip hop artist ILL BILL has announced a headlining tour to support his new album, The Hour of Reprisal. The Brooklyn MC will kick off the tour in Cambridge, MA on September 11 and hit the road for two months. ILL BILL will be joined by Sean Price, member of Heltah Skeltah/Boot Camp Clik.
Marion Cotillard. She's smokin.
And, there you have it. Lots to consider, isn’t there? I hope you enjoyed reading this information. If you have any questions about any of the content, pop a comment below.
Things like organizing the linen closet and cleaning out the junk drawer in the kitchen.
Yet another is that public spending gets out of control as the ANC promises more free things to more people and puts more of them on to the public payroll, including now members of Umkhonto we Sizwe. We might also see a more rigid labour market, destructive interventions in agriculture, attenuation of property rights, damage to private health care, more malfeasance with mining licences, further corruption of the criminal justice system, and more local governments collapsing.
The Bible tells us that Peter and John encountered a man who was lame from birth at the gate of the temple called Beautiful. Subsequently, when Peter said to the man, “In the Name Of Jesus Christ of Nazareth, rise up and walk,” life came into those dead limbs and the man leaped and walked! If Peter had shouted, “In the name of Caesar, rise up and walk!” nothing would have happened. If he had yelled as loud as he could, “In the name of Pontius Pilate rise up and walk,” nothing would have happened either. It had to be “In the Name of Jesus” for that’s the Name above every Name; that’s the name that unlocks every door!
Welcome to the second challenge on this blog. We loved to look at all your cards this last two weeks and they were beautiful. You can see last weeks winner in the post under this one.
cookbooks
All the things I would write today wouldn't be good ones, that much I can promise.
Connected Nation recently announced an upgrade to their mapping application that’s being used in S. Carolina. There’s another story, though. One state resident saw on the map that his home had AT&T DSL service. But when Joe Roget called the company, “They said they had no idea what I was talking about and that whatever map data I was looking at was totally wrong,” Roget reports to Stop the Cap! “The operator was frank with me, saying it was highly unlikely I would ever receive DSL from AT&T and the company was really not expanding DSL access any longer.”
There is some serious stuff going on out there with a realignment within the psyche of the social and political scene within Europe and for some reason everything in my mind is being traced back to the UK, or at least this phase of what is happening is, whatever it is that is happening.
(Phil Pringle is on the CMN Board with the president of the ‘New Covenant International University’. The President of the New Covenant International University, is ‘Dr’ Kevin Dyson.)
Sometime later, getting the words wrong
That God would command justice and righteousness is not unusual; it’s not confusing or out of character. What is, at least on the surface, a little odd is the fourfold rejection laid out prior to this command. God is refusing to respond to the worship of his people through festivals, offerings and songs: all rites that he has instituted. Not only is he rejecting their use, he expresses hatred for them.
Swamp Dogg's Hot Spot
So yesterday was her first school friend playdate. Of course I turned it into a party with a Valentine theme. And it turned out sweeter than I thought it could. I'll let the pictures tell the story.
(6) Also at the top of my screen: access to a new post screen on the very WP site I’m visiting. If I’m inspired to write a post of my own, I don’t have to leave the article that inspired me! (For those of us who have the focus of a flea, this is a godsend. J)
I haven't been outside since the last two incidents with the puppets. I can't let the puppets out of my sight, or something bad might happen. You see, I've changed my approach to the whole situation; I thought I could lock them away in a room and throw away the key, but I've realised now that when I'm not watching them, that's when they make their move.
As they began drifting off, I found myself enjoying the comfort of being surrounded by these two amazing boys with whom I have shared so much. They have seen me at my worst, for sure, but they have also inspired me to be at my best on so many occasions. And while their love and presence have been comforting to me, I like to think that I have comforted them a few times too. Once they were asleep and I was lying there afraid to move lest I wake them up, I began thinking of all of the times when I was at my best, and I could not help but feel a strong tinge of pride at all that I have been able to do as a father, even though I am far from perfect.
Note: I was moved to tears to hear the speech. Classic, timeless, and inspiring. The video is good, too.
852 ***D-IV/6/1983. “For Harold Washington: Proposed Statement for a Lifelong Chicago Democrat.” Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item B-5, above, pp. 473-75 (1992).)
(and pictures!) you brought to our world.
Our deepest fear is not that we are inadequate – our deepest fear is that we are powerful beyond measure. It is our light, not our darkness that most frightens us. We ask ourselves, who am I to be brilliant, gorgeous, talented, fabulous ?
I mean, the defining characteristic of technology is that you can (AND are permitted to) figure out how it works. If you can’t, it’s magic.
Can't happen? You really think so?
Plate pork chops, and top with the vinegar peppers.
Your loyalty is not to me
Release Date : 19 Aug 2011
We are connected to everything in life that we own, covet or touch. Everything. Our coffee in the morning was grown, harvested, ground, shipped and sold. The sugar and tea likewise. The milk probably came from miles away (despite the herd of cows in the field up the road from my house). I have a hybrid car – but still have to fill it with petrol. The plastic and glass that make my reading glasses. The fabric of my clothes. The bricks of my house. I may have bought it, but so many other hands have touched each item along the way – do I honour those shapers, makers and builders? Or do I ignore them in the rush to make something ‘mine?’
For now we have the excitement of The Dark Knight Rises!
Yes, I’m aware of all the TV and movie content on torrents, I guess I’m just saying in relative terms they haven’t been impacted the same way as music, and therefore haven’t felt the same imperatives to innovate.
I've tried to stuff all the emotion down, and haven't really ever dealt with it. Part of me feels like I don't have any right to feel sad, and that my responsibility is to stay upbeat and positive, and make sure that Amy's getting all the support and love she needs. So when I start to feel sad, and think I might cry, I lecture myself and shove it down a little further. I know, I know....that's not good for me--physically, emotionally, or mentally...and it's probably part of the reason I've had almost constant health problems for the last two months.
Learning to read body language is helpful in a lot of situations, but understanding the cues you send out and reading cues from others can be immensely helpful in a job interview. It’s especially important that you come of as pleasant and charming right off the bat because many decisions are made on the basis of a first impression. The most important thing is to avoid negative body language. For the most part you just want to avoid nervous ticks like touching your face and letting your leg become restless. You also don’t want to slouch or sit to rigidly. Basically, your goal is to appear comfortable but professional. If you can do that, you’ll be in good shape.
Otherwise, we'd love to hear from you. Contact us / send stuff to
I’ve since found that up to ten thugs were involved in this terrifying incident.
benjamin behaved . . .
Well if the ends were to discredit climate change, then the means were particularly effective. You only have to browse through the comments and social media reactions to find confirmation that their scientific assassination scored a perfect headshot. ”Great… now even global warming causes global warming. =(” said Zaemus. Just one of hundreds of people in the twitter echo chamber all jumping from the top of the pyramid to pompously repeat the words, “Wind farms cause climate change! Wind farms cause climate change! Wind farms cause climate change!“
She assumed he stopped caring, at least he stopped commenting, he actually stopped talking altogether.
You know feeling good was good enough for me,
Sheffield people are warm and friendly but their city is ceasing to be theirs and is being re-created by local councillors. The election of local councillors is deceitful: they stand for election on local issues but as soon as they are in power act in the interest of outside developers and retailers. Sheffield is so incoherent and disjointed it should be renamed “Jumble City”. The people who pursue these “universal” styles overlook the history in old buildings and their importance for the identity of local people. You could be anywhere as local character and individuality are destroyed. Everywhere is being turned into incoherent muddles without local character.
I took a little break from blogging this weekend to reconnect with my long abandoned Kindle. Apparently my slow brain thinks it's still the weekend, so I find myself post-less for today.
At work I dive into the darkest side of cyberspace to crack cunning code and write clever code to combat it, and hunt down the spammers and take away their tools.
While it is a major European force becoming a member of Nato, Italy is Rome and complete unification of Italy. Some of the in italy pashmina and apartments do not receive any bill at the in italy pashmina a romantic getaway, Italy has it all - mystery, intrigue, religion, beauty and character, and studying the in italy pashmina for two primary reasons. First, these apartments to individuals and families who have taken to any other option, are very high. You do have the in italy pashmina in taking your US number through your home service provider generally stipulates a definite property price surge.
I need to pause for a moment and talk about Decker. He exists for the sole purpose of being a eunuch. Kirk takes his ship away from him, demotes him, and then ignores much of his advice throughout the film until he makes a brash decision that nearly causes the Enterprise to collide with an asteroid. Kirk concedes some expertise to Decker. He is a little rusty after sitting behind a desk for a couple years. then we meet Ilea. He has a thing for a woman who refuses to ever sleep with him Decker is in his mid-thirties, so I am going to assume he is not a virgin, but to devote himself to a woman he can never have physically just makes you lose all respect for him as a man. To call him a beta male is an insult to beta males. He gets gelded in TMP to the point you are disgusted by him rather than sympathize.
“How about moving in with me on Sunday then?”
But behind all this there is something more than personal whims and caprices: a frantic effort to satisfy contending interests. As Marx wrote about Louis Bonaparte, “Driven by the contradictory demands of his situation and being at the same time, like a conjurer, under the necessity of keeping the public gaze fixed on himself,… by springing constant surprises,… Bonaparte throws the entire bourgeois economy into confusion … and produces actual anarchy in the name of order, while at the same time stripping its halo from the entire state machine, profanes it and makes it at once loathsome and ridiculous…”
The ideology espoused by Breivik in the video which follows, makes a strong case against the multi-cultists. When Islamic countries such as Egypt introduce laws to allow men to have sex with the corpses of their dead wives, it is only natural that Europeans should be disgusted by those who advocate - and carry out - such practices. However, coupling murder to ideology, only serves to undermine the ideology itself, and in the case of the murderer of Norwegian children, that acts of terror do not strengthen Europe, but weaken us. The means must always be consistent with the end. Attempts to justify the unjustifiable are the product of Talmudic thought and have no place in Europe.
One thing I have learned and had lost in the first few months of my family being home and together…was instituting “Random Acts of Kindness”…well I mean people were doing it to us, daily, sometimes hourly, after we got home from Haiti and had gone from a family of five to one of eleven. We were in pure survival, and physical healing, so I get that I have a pretty damn good excuse.
I may walk the dark hills of sadness
The cleaning also revealed another telling detail: a noticeable five o’clock shadow on the lady’s face. Moira is known to have owned a portrait of the Chevalier d’Eon, and the Chevalier was known to always wear a black dress and the medal of the Order of St. Louis, which he had been awarded by Louis XV for his work as a spy...
and therefore bringing high costs and inconsistency of decisions for those engaged in patent litigation at a European level.
7. That said, I'm absolutely sick of mallu food. Although I'm having rice withdrawals now and am trying hard not to go ballistic on it, it feels great to not have anything mallu for a while.
A woman’s creative flame to burn?
She added that not all of Series 7′s scripts are written yet, “But we’ve got a lot of them and the ones that are written are really, really epic and very exciting.”
Even a little malicious
This is going to be a blog which will be teaching on all aspects of the family system.
What's not to like? I went to Spoleto twice as a teen, and it's divoon. Opera and chamber music in a historical, picturesque setting not far from the beach. It's like the next best thing to the Bermuda Couch Opera. Oh, wait, haven't gotten there yet.
- Key difference between green and black teas? Green isn't oxidised, whereas black tea is ("oxidation" is just the natural reaction of the tea with air that affects strength and colour in black teas)
near and afar,
and starting our own family traditions.
I was instantly reminded of Summer 2010 when the first Piranha 3D movie was released and why I loved these movies so much. They're not supposed to be highly intelligent works of art... it's supposed to be mindless entertainment for those who are looking for something less serious than the world we live in.
Now that Occupy Los Angeles has issued a call, taken up enthusiastically by Occupies around the country, for a nationwide General Strike on May Day, it behooves us to take a look at the history of General Strikes. In a regular strike, workers put down their tools, leave their jobs, and refuse to go back until their demands are met at a particular workplace or against a particular employer. A General Strike is a mass strike across workplaces and employers. It may be citywide or nationwide. Commonly, as in the case of the 1934 San Francisco strike, General Strikes have been launched by the labor movement to put additional pressure on particular employers (or, in that case, an association of employers) to settle with their workers who are on a long, hard-fought strike, although sometimes General Strikes have raised economic and political demands directed at governments. During General Strikes, striking workers and their unions have often organized systems of distribution for food and medicine and kept other essential services running in ways that are prefigurative of a new kind of society without the need for the capitalist and managerial classes. This has empowered workers — much as the Occupy Wall Street park encampments have done lately — and the capitalists (along with their class-collaborationist buddies in the mainstream unions) have deplored them also for this reason. Some anarchists, especially anarcho-syndicalists (like the Wobblies here in the U.S.), and some Marxists (like the German firebrand Rosa Luxemburg) have put forward the General Strike as the most effective (and least violent) way to get rid of capitalism. A General Strike was nearly successful at bringing down the Tsarist Regime in 1905. But other revolutionaries since Engels have challenged the notion that all or most workers in an advanced capitalist country could ever be organized to stop work together and bring down the state as improbable and said, in any case, if workers had become that powerful already then a General Strike would not be a necessary step for making a revolution.
*) Propose that people of all faiths refer to God as Allah to "create more dialogue."
I love the 'vintage-style' florals of this paper and hope it's ok
My son thought I was “freaking out!” and overreacting to his declining grades. I was frustrated and angry he wasn’t doing his homework and allowing his grades to fall as he was extremely bright, just not applying himself. I arranged a brief meeting with my life coach with both my son and I late in the day at Starbucks. My son loved their taizo chai tea and it was a relaxed atmosphere, conducive to a good chat.
Unlike some of the other True Romance palettes, all 8 shades are powder shadows. The inky black Lucifer is the anchor shade in this otherwise neutral palette, which makes this a day-to-night-possible palette. Just smoke things out with Lucifer and you can possibly turn a neutral office-friendly look into a smokey night-out look.
-Feel feel free to interpret the sketch to fit your style - as long as we can see you have taken inspiration from the sketch there is no need to follow it exactly.
According to the comments at the Beeld article the one judge was working with a fake degree.
And this is a card for her mother's birthday this weekend. My girl is also very good at discovering stamp sets I've yet to ink up myself, this one a Christmas gift from Meg. If you look closely, you can see where she discovered that cardstock can scorch when you're embossing if you're not careful! It's also been suggested I need heart-shaped die-cuts. :P
The guy at checkout was fairly dubious I knew what to do with this. He said, "Do you know what this is?" I promised him I did. He was not convinced and said, looking at my lilly white skin "You know Indians are the ones who use this." HaHa!
one leg?!
Now, let me begin by saying that if you don’t have any education at all in the topic of Earth & space science, astronomy, physics, and what-have-you that I can understand an almost blind acceptance of geocentrism for one simple reason: it certainly appears that everything in the sky moves around the Earth. Look in the sky and you’ll see the Sun, Moon, planets, stars, etc all moving – from your frame of reference – around the Earth.
Its a lovely day and a nice fresh Citrusy Couscous seemed like a good idea for lunch.
since their words
Bree’s pre-trial hearing has begun and the prosecution is dragging out all the men that Bree slept with while she was trolling bars. The theory is that she doesn’t remember all the men she slept with, so there’s a chance she slept with Ramon Sanchez/Alejandro and doesn’t remember. Bree is mortified and doesn’t want to tell her lawyer about any of her transgressions. It’s only after he tells her some humiliating things about himself that she opens up.
You will need 3 of each size rose petals, an embossing pad, a stylus tool and some wax paper. Text weight paper works the best but you can certainly use card stock as well.
She shoos away cookies in favor of crackers. She adores plain cooked green beans. I’ve been trying since Easter, but she won’t let a marshmallow anywhere near her mouth.
for good or bad, and then holding them to that assessment
Phil: While tidying a pile of books the other day I notice a couple of Tom Sharpes and realised there are lessons to be learned. Between publication of “Blott on the Landscape” in 1975 and “Granchester Grind” in 1995, things changed as Mr Sharpe became better known.
Come ride, dance and experience the ultimate freedom: trading your car for a bike!
Songs are like lovers: the best ones have a good heart, a good brain, and a great body.
It all looked spic and span, but one thing was easily forgotten.
So reads one of many signs in front and in the windows the Plymouth Blockbuster store (Sheldon & Ann Arbor Roads.)
Okay. I'm writing this in my e-mail program so I can write and read and edit. My thoughts on this topic are .... well.... categorized, actually. I was going to say they're rambling but really they're categorized. Welll...they''ll probably end up being categorized rambles...
Sincerely in Christ
Amelia Peabody and her Egyptologist husband, Radcliffe Emerson, are off, not to Egypt, but to Palestine. Out of chronological order, this one is set in 1910, at a time when the Ottoman Empire was crumbling and the British were trying to stem German influence in the Holy Land. The Emersons set off, at the behest of the War Office, which is concerned that a bumbling archaelogist may or may not be a German spy, but in any case is likely to engage in a dig that will antagonize Jew, Muslim and Christian alike.
man… he is a pain”… Today it’s the Christian who is the “pain” in our society. Amos was a sheep herder (Amos 1:1)… Note Amos 7:14-15… “I was no prophet, neither was I a prophet’s son, but I was a herdsman and a gatherer of sycamore fruit, and the Lord took me as I followed the flock, and the Lord said to me, Go prophesy to my people Israel.” Amos was a “layman”… a laborer, a shepherd… a tree trimmer and a fruit picker. As a shepherd, he had a caring and compassionate spirit. As a tree trimmer and a fruit picker, he was meticulous and accurate. He was uneducated as far as this world’s systems were concerned… but a man anointed can do much more than an educated man without the anointing. Amos was humble… he made no attempt to hide his occupation, nor was he ashamed to hide his birth. He was an industrious man… a busy man. Amos did not preach over the heads of the people… He used terms that were familiar to the people, but he also used wisdom and intelligence in how he caught the people’s attention by first speaking of Israel’s enemies. Amos was faithful to his call… He was not an ear-tickler… nor was he an eye-pleaser. He refused to be turned away from the work that God had given him to do. His message was, “Thus saith the Lord”… Amos’ success can be seen in Amos 7:10, where the entire land was affected by his words. Amos was a “layman”… “first class”…
We were late because I mistaken another mall for Selayang mall. Anyway, we made it just on time and the kids rushed into the centre court of Selayang Mall while I looked for parking.
Make Memories and Live With Pass!
I can happily look at pictures of fruits and veggies but it does not mean the same to me as reading about and seeing what happens in the gardens of Chickory. Had Chickory not written her posts about chickens in the gardens or teaching dogs not to eat chickens or trample veggies or how to sky rocket the hawks away from her flocks, or life within the gray truck empire would we be engaged in this life story?
Bollywood’s comeback queen – Madhuri Dixit is all set to reappear on the silver screens, yet again. Films like The Dirty Picture and Kahaani have changed the entire trend in Bollywood lately. Seems like Women centric films are the in thing today.
CHRIS VERENE: I'm very close with my family, pictured and not pictured. As an only child, I clung to my cousins like siblings, and we still are very connected. I do not work as an 'observer,' that is your job as the audience. I am relating the stories from their source, our family, town, and neighbors out to the world at large. I think that the act of photographing makes me close with only the people who really enjoy the photography-- the people who time and again ask for pictures, and compel me to tell those stories.
Jenni Mitchell (Grace’s daughter) and husband Mervyn Hannan have re-opened the residence/shop as a Fine Art Gallery and teaching studio.
BM: Again it was another role that I really enjoyed because I always liked Burton from back in the day and thought he was great. I almost met him once when I was directing a show and knew his daughter Kate. She was in the show and he was doing a play with Elizabeth Taylor on Broadway, Private Lives. Three of the other people in the cast were in one of my shows and Burton said that he wanted to be in it and I said “great” and sent him over a piece to read but later on he told me that he was on the wagon and he was afraid that if he came over he would start drinking again. It was a big disappointment. But anyway, I used to get that a lot, that I looked like him and his daughter was one who said it. I was doing another play with a lot of Welsh poetry in it called Secrets of the Celtic Heart which I was doing in Edinburgh, Scotland and the fellow who wrote the play, his daughter was there and she happened to catch that and he contacted me and wanted me to do it. Eventually I gave in and got into the damn thing. Burton’s whole family came to see it when we opened it in the new Welsh Millennium Center in Cardiff and his family came up from the little village that he was from, and his brother was there and it was kind of funny. Afterward I see the brother and he was talking to somebody but kept looking over at me and I was wondering what he was going to say and finally he gives me the nod to come over. He says (Mallon impersonates a Welsh accent), “Tell me this: were you wearing lifts in your shoes when you were onstage?” (laughs) I said, “Yes I was, actually. Not now, but I was then.” He said, “I thought so,” and looked around, “So did Richard. You’re exactly the same height and exactly the same size from head to toe.” Then he said that he had one criticism for me and I thought, “Uh oh, here it comes” and the brother goes, “You didn’t smoke enough. Richard would never be one minute without a cigarette in his mouth.” (laughs).
Reading: Jesus answered, “Amen, amen, I say to you, no one can enter the kingdom of God without being born of water and Spirit.What is born of flesh is flesh and what is born of spirit is spirit.Do not be amazed that I told you, ‘You must be born from above.’ The wind* blows where it wills, and you can hear the sound it makes, but you do not know where it comes from or where it goes; so it is with everyone who is born of the Spirit.” (John 3:5-8)
I still haven’t gone that much into it. Spain, France, Sweden, Norway and Germany are places where theres some potential, not to mention Switzerland. If anyone in these places or others is interested in organizing a meeting or event, feel free to contact me. About doing something in USA, I had planned to go to the next SelfReliance Expo, but settling is taking bit longer and I just wont be able to make it. We’re happy but relocating the way we did to a place that is completely new to us takes time and lots of work.
For craft brewery start-ups in New Jersey, 2011 was a hot year, with five brewing enterprises being licensed by state and federal regulators. Great Blue, named for the herons that feed at a pond on the farm, led the pack, getting licensed Feb. 28, 2011. (In chronological order, last year's class of new breweries goes like this: Great Blue, Cape May Brewing, Kane Brewing, Carton Brewing and Tuckahoe Brewing.)
Rnd 1) ch2, 11hdc in second ch from hook, sl st to top of first hdc (11hdc)
steep then flat, the snow
Because the Chase Lake National Wildlife Refuge has been done to provide funding for the pharmacist jobs north dakota, outdoor activities are plentiful, particularly considering large sections of the pharmacist jobs north dakota that are accredited. Accreditation means that if it's only been 1 or 2 years when a person will receive a continued coverage even if you love pizza why not have to get away from everything. The state seems to be one of their own feet in the pharmacist jobs north dakota and the pharmacist jobs north dakota of alternative fuel sources coming from soybeans and corn, which have been making headlines in their many marked trails for horse riding.
I think this story is based on mother’s longing to meet baby again. It made spite. Really horrible and sad story.
The sun is peeking out through the clouds and the rain. It was fun to pretend to be artsy with my photography skills!
While Xlibris offer a wide range of marketing add-ons, as part of their packs, as well as purchased individually, I think the move to expanded service packs has not been a step in the right direction. It really is hard to warrant a publishing fee of $5999 to $12999 for what you actually get. The lower end Advantage and Basic packs are at least reasonable value for money, but there are other POD publishers who offer the same at a cheaper price.
I gave the students magazines and calendars and told them that their subject had to be an animal or a person. I also showed them my example which was a frog. Not surprisingly, all of them chose animals. Then I made a color photocopy of the animal. They cut
First I filled my white pitcher overflowing with these fresh green Snowball Viburnum.
My Best Fiend
Favorite Movie: The Devils Arithmetic
Rake (to rake the leaves, of course!)
Okay, I’ve got to defend that–this being, by any definition “good”–but I think I can. In Boogie Nights (1997), what Paul Thomas Anderson does so incredibly well is to write dumb people dialogue that’s really funny. Trapped in the Closet is that kind of funny but even better because its rhymes are so barely-plausible.
my new tarot cards
So that's it. I'm proud of my brave little boy. And I bet he doesn't even remember it. Glad it's finally done!
- An editorial in the July 14, 2011 Washington Post reached the following conclusion: "A balanced budget amendment would deprive policymakers of the flexibility they need to address national security and economic emergencies." By extension, does that mean without a balanced budget amendment, our political class will keep us safe and handle all of our economic problems?
The paper is from the Lime Twist: Life of the Party pad by My Mind's Eye. The stamps are from the Heart to Heart oval set by JustRite Stampers. I stamped the frame in Versamark and heat embossed it with black embossing powder. I stamped the sentiment in SU! Riding Hood Red ink and popped it up on dimensional boosters.
The overall result is a tense and entertaining film that is unfortunately let down by the lack of motive for the bad guy and a rather anti-climactic ending.
cloud (for puddle): 2.5"
if it is, should we try to get that back?
Ask yourself: who gave them the right to judge Israel and find it wanting? Is it the fact that Israel was the only democracy in the Middle East (and may return to that status if Iraq does not succeed)? Is their judgment at all connected to their similar judgments about America and her presence in the Middle East? And how do they manage to blind themselves to the presence of Hezbollah in Beirut or Hamas in Palestine? What part of “jihad” do they fail to understand?
12-14-2011
9. BBC Radio Outro (0:19)
there is no such thing working as freedom of judgment by disconnection, this is nothing but disapproval by hiding
Our whole design team is just crazy about this page of digitals, all Victorian women. And some of us have used that page 4 or 5 times already !
so to speak
I wanted to share with you all my decorations around my home. I have put it off , but now I can reveal my decorations. Hope you guys enjoy it and I can inspire you to decorate your homes.
Unfortunately, the goal of cheap and plentiful nutritious salmon is only partly realized: farm-raised salmon costs less, comprises 50% of the commercial market, but it is not very nutritious and in fact may cause more health harm than benefit. Read on.
Billy Preston - Will It Go Round In Circles
Goodbye old friend.
There is undoubtably a planned and conspiratorial element in the whole affair. The police have held Jashim, a construction worker from Hajipara, who has confessed that he was given money to break a section of the wall of a local mosque by Mohammad Lokman, the chief functionary of the Hajipara Jam-e-Moshjid. One is reminded of Bhishma Sahani’s ‘Tamas’. The formal and informal links between militant religious organizations, ‘charities’, expatriate supporters, political groups, local police and underemployed youths have created lasting cesspools. The AL can chose to look away from the growing radicalization at its own peril. In the upcoming elections, they need a spirited turnout from the base. While frightened minorities have voted the AL, a significant section might just stay home. Fright after all cannot be long-term political capital. That fixed deposit matures after sometime. AL needs to reinvest in building up the secular fabric of Bangladesh. Leaving solidarity actions only to expressedly left-secular organizations is a cynical strategy at best. A majority can still be forged against the growing clout of fundamentalism. That politics is arduous but the future of Bangladesh and the subcontinent is connected to the outcome of that struggle.
+ Hank Williams - 40 Greatest Hits - 1978
So what does it all add up to?
Times are hard for most of us at the moment and saving money for big things can be quite hard to do. If the washing machine breaks down, for example, it can be hard to find the money to fix it, let alone buy a new one. Having credit somewhere can offer you some way to help make that purchase and, so long as you can afford to do so, then you can pay it off on a monthly basis which can be much easier to manage.
Sex ratio theory, in which mothers produce different proportions of males and females, has been a particularly fruitful area for applying inclusive fitness theory. So has “altruism”—suicidal honeybees are just one example. And so are parental care and aspects thereof, especially parent-offspring conflict, a field brought to life by Bob Trivers using inclusive fitness theory. How else can you explain weaning conflict except by a conflict between the mother’s genetic welfare and that of her offspring?
This new sexual counter-revolution is bigger than America. The rhetoric of god, marriage, morality and little girls learning to keep their legs closed has crossed the pond with all the tooth-aching tenacity of a Katy Perry song. Last week, we had Baroness Warsi going to the Vatican to
my pallid skin, frail porcelain,
to mend their beer-battered wings. Their
So even in the world of digital versions, the publisher still has to sell at least 300 copies a year to keep the work in print. If they don’t, rights revert to the author.
Classifying a late 20th Century home can be difficult as they're often a mix of elements from different styles. But most homes have at least one strong feature that puts closer to one style than another. Find that dominant feature and you'll be on the right track to naming the style.
maybe if we get a ton of entrys whoever was the first to pick the combo in the end that wins can get a freebie? Lets get lots of players!
Actually, while suggesting a media autonomy from corporate and government power that we believe to be incompatible with structural facts (as we describe below), Bagdikian also may be understating the degree of effective concentration in news manufacture. It has long been noted that the media are tiered, with the top tier-as measured by prestige, resources, and outreach-comprising somewhere between ten and twenty-four systems. It is this top tier, along with the government and wire services, that defines the news agenda and supplies much of
If you can't go, then maybe you'd like to stop by one of our Boca Raton libraries to meet these terrific authors. On Wednesday, March 2, at 2:00 p.m. the Glades Road Library will be hosting both Michael Palmer, author of A HEARTBEAT AWAY, which just came out, and his son, Daniel Palmer, whose first novel, DELIRIOUS, came out a couple of weeks ago.
When I left the service, I was pretty dismayed. Obviously worship was a major priority at this church, but it didn’t compare to any of the most meaningful services I had experienced, some with no instruments, others with terrible voices, and almost all without special lighting and soundboards. The difference was community. The thing that had set apart every other service was a community of people participating in worship, not an emotional environment that’s geared at manipulating feelings. The irony of this service was summarized by its lighting. Church is the place of the community God, the place where we come to celebrate together, and it was so dark that I couldn’t tell who was around me.
"Charles Wallace understands more than the rest of us, doesn't he?
You will see that the price of shipping dropped 90 percent right after the Lehman shock.
Philippians 1:27-28 (NLT)
6/28/68 Santa Monica Civic Auditorium, Santa Monica, CA
Something has been weighing on me for a long time…I don’t usually talk about my troubles online. However since I seriously doubt it will be read by anyone I know I’m going to get it off my mind…at least for today.
and kisses goodnight.
Both bitter and sweet, making me so happy
The evening was dark and still, except for the occasional distant rumble of thunder. The only light on the porch was the glow from the screens of our electronic gizmos.
20 each
The erosion of the Schengen Agreement, which permitted free movement within the EU, is an important indicator of how far the political situation has deteriorated. Opposition to free movement as a fundamental principle of European integration is fueled by rising unemployment, growing xenophobia, as well as legitimate concern that Western Europe will continue to be flooded with illegal immigrants from North Africa, sub-Saharan Africa and South Asia.
Let me preface this post by saying that there are moments in life where I royally fail as a mom. Granted, I’m not giving my child steak knives or matches to play with, but sometimes there are mini-moments where I wish life was a DVR that I could pause, re-wind and erase.
Unlockable How to Unlock
Conclusion: All in all, I really like these buildings. the cons are minor (to me anyway) and for a little more than $10.50 a building, you get some easy to build terrain that looks good as is, or you can customize it to your tastes.
Christmas at Cadillac Jack's ... TBN ... 12 PM
We had some sugar cane juice at the pagoda and just sat in the shade for a while. Then we went back on the bikes and went to this some restaurant. I don’t know the name of the thing we had. There were two cooking pots on our table and the waitress brought out a bunch of 5″ long living fish and dumped them into the soup. I was king of weary of trying it at first, but it was actually really good. The only problem I had was it is extremely had to get the meet off of fish using only chop sticks. I’m definitely not a pro at using chop sticks.
FADE IN:
So who’s going to keep the native religion alive while all the ‘Godders’ go around being all Xian which was only imported when the Angles colonised and butchered the local Scots, Irish and Welsh? He who has no roots has no future. And that is why Israel and Palestine both have the sympathy of many with Israel holding to Judaism which of course was derived from the Egyptians.
NTDS quickly became the primary information superhighway of the Navy from the early 1960s through the mid-1990s. Any time the Navy needed to keep a clear picture of the air (and surface and subsurface) situation, off Vietnam, Lebanon, or off the shores of Iraq during Desert Storm, NTDS equipped ships were there.
These were words spoken by Nelson Mandela during his inaugural speech on 10 May 1994. The same words were repeated on the radio today (Freedom Day) word for word by Helen Zille, which I presume she was reading from this disingenuous speech she drafted for the occasion, and which starts off with: – “On this day, the 27th of April, exactly 18 years ago a democratic South Africa was born.”
2. When is your birthday?
A student brought a version of this pattern to a class recently, and I fell in love. It's a classic church bazaar pattern, and very similar to the “Trauma Teddy” pattern distributed by the New Zealand and Australian Red Cross organizations (a version here, with jaunty stripes, and another here, info about the program here). I don’t know that the copyright belongs to anyone – this is my transcription of the pattern, with additional notes. There are plenty of others floating around online, and on dog-eared photocopied handouts, like this one... (click to embiggen)
See, does that make me a bad person? Please leave a comment to tell me if i am or not. (explain too.) Yet i get yelled at for taking my boyfriend’s phone and playing around saying “ooo who is this girl your texting.” Yeah i know. dont snoop into peoples phones unless they let you. Look, him and i started liking each other because that happened. I would take his phone and we would fight for it. It was fun and playful. It was cute. (well to me it was.) I mean i even make jokes like *Oh is that your other girlfriend texting you? Can i meet her.” I mean come on, does that sound like jealousy? I think it sounds funny. Cause your not suppose to have another girlfriend and all. Nope, no way in hell am i going to live this down now. I get yelled at by my own blood that it is rude to do that and i shouldnt even be texting my ex and all.
I wasn’t supposed to be on the drops this long. I don’t know how long it’s been. The ability to hold numbers in my head for long was the first thing to go. Days of the week followed.
So, in only a week I can safely say that these babies have become my go to shoes. Simply put, awesomeness in a pair of shoes. Except the colors aren’t vibrant enough for my taste. Should they come out in hot pink or neon purple, I will definitely get another pair for rotation purposes (Brooks, are you reading this?).
In one of the most horrifying things I’d ever seen, Sophie gave a huge growl, and before I could react, bounded towards me, tearing at my pure white wings, my head and my arms, ripping with her razor sharp teeth and claws. Worse than the scorching pain was the betrayal, why would Sophie - dear sweet Sophie who I had raised from a kitten - attack me so brutally?
As the herbivores graze and chew off the tops of the grasses, part of the root system dies back and feeds the soil organisms. Intermittent grazing creates cycles of root die-back and regrowth that provides a rich feast for all who inhabit the soil community. And there are a lot of hungry mouths! It is said that a teaspoon of good soil contains almost as many tiny denizens as there are people on Earth.
This week’s discussion of Brandon Sanderson’s “Mistborn: The Final Empire” covers chapters seven to fifteen. Next week’s reading will cover chapters sixteen through twenty five.
b. Assuming the true world, it could still be a world less valuable for us; precisely the quantum of illusion might be of a higher rank on account of its value for our preservation. (Unless appearance as such were grounds for condemnation?)
The history of Joseph Smith and the origins of Mormonism are well documented. And there is little doubt that O'Donnell misrepresented them, by repeating a claim that has long been used by Mormon opponents to tar its followers as a sort of cult created to justify the sexual license of its founders.
Goodness, I'm tired. Either I'm getting old or I'm coming down with something. Thank God it's Friday. I got home only to find there was nothing to eat except tomato sauce with giant pasta tubes. I hate tomato sauce pasta - it makes me feel like an impoverished Italian peasant. But LSS had made it because Grace I-Don't-Like-This McDiarmid had come over for a play date. So I ended up eating toast and Marmite and left-over rocket salad and a hunk of corned beef I found in the fridge. Was it for this the flesh grew tall?
Here are a few photos I took upon coming home (it has been raining non-stop here!). I love this time of year because buds are appearing and in the next few weeks, the trees will burst into bloom with dogwoods, cherry blossoms and magnolias beautifying the city with wonderful colours. I'll have my camera ready to take advantage of these moments but in the meantime...a taste of the view in Mexico...Love you! Love, me. Bubbs...
Sewing the rows isn't the most fun part of making this quilt....I suggest that you take it slow and easy. I felt like I had to do a good deal of pushing/pulling the quilt to get it through the machine, but it wasn't unbearable, either.
So what did we do all day? We drove the two-seater motor boat/double bed. Just drove it into happy land. Bartlett was a good passenger.
The study, conducted by researchers from Cambridge University and published in 1996, examined blood levels of antioxidant vitamins and carotenoids in people from two regions of the world with very different rates of heart disease: Toulouse, France, and Belfast, Ireland.
My Muse and I hold Cindy's book in safekeeping.
Valentine's Resort and Marina is a luxury hotel perched on the pink sands of Harbour Island in The Bahamas. One look and you will understand why Harbour Island has recently been bestowed the honor of "Best Beaches in the Caribbean" by Travel and Leisure Magazine.
The current Tomahawk, the Block 4, costs about $1.8 million each, weighs 1.4 tons, has a range of 1,500 kilometers and carries a half ton warhead. It moves to its target at a speed of 880 kilometers an hour. The Tomahawk was introduced 29 years ago, and over 6,000 have been manufactured. The U.S. Navy has fired nearly 2,000 in combat and training.
Before this, the men had lined up and raced 10,000 Meters. Stanford was both a favorite for the team, having been ranked #1 all year, and the individual with undefeated Chris Derrick having beaten last years runner-up Sam Chelanga of Liberty at Pre-Nats.The race started the same way it did last year with Chelanga exploding from the start. A good pack tucked in behind him and hoped he would come back to them as he did last year and this year at Pre-Nat's. He didn't. Chelanga continued his blistering pace and extended his lead over the chase pack which, in addition to Derrick, included David McNeill (NAU) and Barnabas Kirui (Miss.). Scanning the pack it was becoming clear that Stanford was way out of the running with Derrick's usual support cast (mainly Elliott Heath) nowhere in sight. BYU held a very early lead but it was clear that the Cowboys of Oklahoma State were running tightly knit close behind. There was no sign of German Fernandez up front, but Colby Lowe was right up there and running strong. Chelanga never faltered and ran away to a course record win of 28:41 to beat last years record of 29:03 by Oregon's Galen Rupp. McNeill pulled away from an exhausted looking Derrick and held on 29:06 to 29:14 for second. Soon after Ryan Vail and Colby Lowe came in for OSU as both were in the top 10. John Kosgei and Girma Mesecho soon followed and the outcome was a done deal. German Fernandez crossed the line in 97th (77th team score) and it was clear that he was not himself this entire season. Some of the past results showed he was off but may have been rounding into shape, although those results were skewed perhaps, as OSU seemed to tempo run to all their victories. After the race, Coach Dave Smith said German had been injured all summer and had just begun to get into training in October. While a great testament to his team ethic to sacrafice his ego, status, for the good of the team and to be part of the team title, one has to wonder if he would have been better off redshirting this season. He was clearly not the German the running community has revered and admired, the defending NCAA 1500 meter champion who also ran a 13:25 5000 this summer. You have to think there were some surprised runners running alongside him back there. In fact, OSU would have still won the title without him in the race at all. Hopefully, if he is not healed and ready, he will redshirt indoors and come back very strong for the outdoor season.
What are the most important lessons your mother taught you?
“These children are the innocent bystanders of the global war on AIDS, which is destroying the social fabric in sub-Saharan Africa. For decades, the virus festered in the region while the world stood by paralyzed with indifference. Meanwhile, the numbers grew to epic proportions, becoming a human catastrophe unprecedented in history. Today, two-thirds of the world’s people living with HIV – an estimated 22 million adults and children – live in sub-Saharan Africa, only a fraction of them benefiting from the expensive, life giving drugs that have made AIDS a manageable disease in the West.”
By adding the lettuce a little more dressing to toss, you have a full meal...so satisfying, healthy and delicious.
Analysis: Kalil has been a consensus pick for awhile, personally I think the Vikes trade this pick if they get the chance, they’ve got quite a few holes and there are a lot of promising LT in this class. Even if they do keep the pick Blackmon would fill a big need at Receiver. Percy Harvin isn’t enough, and his injury history makes getting Christian Ponder some targets an even more urgent need.
1 de Octubre,2010
Not even close. I wish that I could say that I had done this and more...but I sure have not. I have gotten a few more chapters read in the book I have been working on since the fall, but it's not even close to being finished yet. I like reading it and I think that it's super interesting...but by the time I have gotten to bed at night I have fallen asleep before there was any time at all for reading...
What I need is for someone to help me understand how I can make myself feel the self-esteem I know I should have. Someone to help me discover how I can cope with the intensity of my emotions.
The Promise
I tend the holy in those around me by….
This is the term used for hearing without letting anything touch your brain cells. Total tune-out. Many Indians will agree with you without hearing a single word you say or correct you hearing only half of what you say and the rest they construct from the people they have met before. When you speak to an Indian, he is not responding to you or anything you said.. just to the sum total of what he has heard in life till then on that topic.. and then he states his position on that subject. With a 20,000 year history and everything already said by everyone better than you, where is the need to hear you out or to understand the theme of your argument?
stage right
I started out with my Zig Glue pen but the rascal was dry! Hmmm.... I think it's been quite some time since I used it and the tip was rock hard! I used my Beacon 3-in-1 glue instead. A bit messy but it worked fine. How are you coming with your Easter crafts??
Our polical stage now is centered with hatred and grudges, accuses and lies, drama and tragedy rather than collaborations and positive actions towards the Rakyat’s good. You as government’s representive should not in any way show your support towards the opponent, and so do to the Opposition should not even show a smile to the opponent. Okay sorry, I am a bit exaggerting. But seriously, without considering our own good, these two components will never find solution for the betterment of the country. Like two pigs meet in a big swamp, who wants to be the PM?
1 can diced tomatoes
Acer is obviously pitching the A200 at families and first-time tablet buyers. The Acer Iconia Tab A200 wears its family-friendly persona on its sleeve, with a friendly curved rectangle form factor and a soft, rubber-coated back that reminds us more than a little of the BlackBerry PlayBook.
Smith said the march is “in response to police repression … that will draw a connection between stay away orders for Occupy Oakland and gang injunctions.”
﻿I have to say I am getting fitter. I can now do about 15 burpees in one minute - it is knackering but when I started it I could barely complete a couple. I can also hold the 'dolphin plank' position for 30 seconds before collapsing to the floor. Now this may sound pathetic to all you fitness buffs and it probably is but, once again, I couldn't do this for love nor money when I started. I am working up to being able to do it for the full one minute. I've had 3 c-sections too so stomach muscles aren't my speciality. I can also do the sprint starts fairly comfortably. All progress.
O’er the
Arismendi and his colleagues considered more than 600 gauging stations for the study but only 20 of the stations had a sufficiently lengthy period of monitoring – and lacked human influence. These long-term monitoring sites are operated primarily by the U.S. Geological Survey and U.S. Forest Service, and were located in Oregon, Washington, Idaho, California, Nevada and Alaska.
separated by location
Today, if you are an author, you probably have a blog. Blogs rose to fame and fortune about five years back, when websites really came into vogue. An author could grab a reader via their website, and keep them reading by the means of a blog. Between websites, blogs, and forum boards, you could reach a great number of folks who were potential readers.
Me: Ethan. Pee is poison. Your pee is poison. Everyone's pee is poison. It is all the yucky stuff that your body cannot use - so it gets rid of it as pee. So, you put poison in the heating duct... and now, the air that come through this pipe to heat your room is going to smell like pee - which is poison - and is harmful to smell! You don't PEE in here! We pee in the toilet. We don't pee in the garbage can, or on the carpet, or in a bottle (that's another story), or anywhere in the house EXCEPT for the toilet!
These only came out towards the end of the buffet, guess cos some of the desserts ran out? But to me, this was the best dessert of the night (Aside from crepes) though the tart was a little soggy, it was still nice and buttery, creme patisserie was good and fruits were ample in such a small tart! Loved it!
How much does a Dollar-Day hot dog cost if you run out of Dollar-Day hot dogs on the 5th race of Dollar-Day hot dog day? This answer doesn’t need to be in the form of a Jeopardy question. It’s simple math. Nothing! There aren’t any Dollar-Day dogs to buy unless you want to buy the real hot dog. This more expensive dog looks and tastes just like the other less expensive hot dog but as before, , , you guessed it, , , the new available dog to buy on Dollar-Day hot dog day costs only 2 and a half bucks more than the Dollar-Day dog we advertise on Dollar-Day hot dog day.
In Sweden, a lot of marriages in my generation nowadays end with a divorce. I started to wonder about why so many of these divorces become so destructive. People I know and always looked upon as sensible and wise, who lived together for many years and have children together, suddenly started to behave like maniacs. As if they were each other’s worst enemies.
7:41: “So if you have a set of gonads, testes, testicles..use ‘em!” Is he hitting on me right now? I think he is hitting on me right now. I love being the prettiest girl at the ball…I mean…uhhh….hey, look is that another car driving by?!?!?!
And…nothing will happen. The police deny everything, close ranks, demonize the accusers, and get away with crimes no one else could. They’re nothing but lowlife thugs who found a job.
Chairman of the Greater Statesville Development Corporation Board of Directors, Dr. Steve Binder, commented on the news. ““Clearly our goal is to be #1 every year, but in the bigger picture it’s our consistent performance year-after-year that sets Statesville-Mooresville apart. This will mark the seventh consecutive year that we have been either #1 or #2 and that’s pretty remarkable.”
Jesus spoke the words, “Let us pass over unto the other side,” and there was enough power and authority in those words to accomplish the job. One thing I want you to notice is that Jesus did not take command of the ship to see that His words were carried out. He walked to the back of the boat and went to sleep. Jesus delegated the authority to His disciples and they accepted it. But when the storm came, they were filled with fear that the boat would sink. Jesus had to carry out the responsibility of authority, which He had delegated to them, by rebuking the wind and the sea.
Buying this is not a problem, because we guarantee
Emily pulled on her boots, grabbed her coat and ran outside. Rudolph turned to nuzzle Emily's neck as she rushed towards the sleigh to see if this was real. Santa reach down and grabbed Emily pulling her up and into the sleigh with him. She sat on his lap leaning against his long, soft white beard.
It wasn’t until their twenty-first wedding anniversary that Connie became ill. She couldn’t hold down food, and the mornings were extremely hard on her stomach. The fear of stomach cancer, which had killed her precious mother, was all she was concerned with. However, she was relived when the doctor told her it wasn’t cancer. Connie was pregnant with a menopause baby. In the shadow of Patch mountain, God seems to hold the blessings back until we deserve them. The news was alarming to Gary. He didn’t know if he was being blessed or cursed. He couldn’t believe they were finally going to be blessed with a baby. Both Gary and Connie were completely flabbergasted.
Monticello AVA
13 Somebody Loves Me (Gershwin, Desylva, Ballantine, MacDonald) 3:48
The nascent third-party movement called Americans Elect assembled a dream team of prospective presidential nominees: Mike Bloomberg! Colin Powell! Chris Christie! Mitch Daniels! Condi Rice! Rick Santorum! Hillary Clinton!
Lissos had no fortifications, only a few watchtowers, it was known as a pilgrimage site for its healing waters. The fount is still running too. The place was so tranquil, it calmed my heart. The valley was also filled with huge gnarly trees, of which I haven’t seem a lot on Crete.
Black Pepper Steak (2nd visit): 6.5/10 (when the steak was particularly chewy on the second visit)
When Bristol moved to California, it was for the purpose of making a reality television series with the Massey brothers, with whom she lived. Tripp was two years old at the time. Two-year-olds really like living in California, so that must have been why she took that job.
After dragging myself out into the cold I did 20 minutes cardio at the gym to warm up before pilates. This involved:
Sounds like a brilliant opportunity if there ever was one, n’est-ce pas??
Now apparently one isn't responsible enough for that until they are 21. This makes no sense to me. Either you are an adult or you are a minor.
Brooklyn has certainly seen some fights in its day, but nothing will ever quite compare to the battle witnessed by tavern-goers on August 27, 1776. This was one for the history books. Literally. The Battle of Brooklyn.
Book 1, Of Sun & Moon, is now available in paperback and ebook at Amazon, Barnes & Noble, Smashwords, Apple iBooks, Sony eReader Store and more.
Because it's Garden Crazy All The Fucking Time Around Here, folks.
Thousands of sketchbooks have been sent all around the world to people who have signed up to participate in The Sketchbook Project 2012. The books that are returned by January 31st, 2012 will be part of a traveling world exhibit. Once the exhibit is over the books will enter into the permanent collection at The Brooklyn Art Library.
Happy face: Due to his high-quality appearance, Chanyeol was praised by many people for his face appearance, just a second before was sighing because his appearance did not match his deep-voiced rap, the next second he lost his expression to his cute teeth-baring smile. This wide-eyed, bared-teeth expression, paired with his explosive hairstyle at that time, can be as happy as you want him to be, and also, when he is not singing and performing, he maintains this signature expression, which is completely different from his serious expression onstage; it’s as though he were two different people.
three
So the next time you are thinking of throwing away your old entertainment center because you don't have room for it or your new TV won't fit in it think about reusing it in another way. An entertainment center makes a great craft storage place and a wrapping center.
Boston College
A little root beer, a little microwave popcorn, some curly ribbon and another cheesy saying...here's what you get...
A while back I made these buffalo chicken enchiladas. I love that whole wheat tortillas were used in the making of this dish.
In the following the notation A(a,b)B means the reaction a+A→b+B. The atomic number of Oxygen is 8 and that of Fluorine is 9.
"For 17-year-old Rhine Ellery, a daring escape from a suffocating polygamous marriage is only the beginning…
I’ve had a raspberry smoothie for breakfast and mixed nuts for my mid morning snack. Lunch was just a Food Doctor Wholesome Pot as I had to spend my lunch hour running errands so I needed something quick, warm and filling! This was closely followed by a ginger bread Nakd bar. Mid afternoon I had to pop out of work for five minutes so I took the opportunity to buy myself a bag of peanut M&M’s – not great, but I had some good news to celebrate! I ate a banana before the gym and just had a quick session – 20 minutes cross trainer and 20 minute random bike intervals.
The teacher walked along the aisles. Students shrank in their seas as she passed them.
He went on to say that most of the commanding officers he saw didn't seem to have ever done a day of patrol work. "I like patrol," he said. "They did it once, but they forgot."
But Party Time arrived on time and clear as a bell...which pleased and relieved me greatly. The only loaded he was was money loaded. It were also a relief he'd the dregs of a London twang which made him easier to understand.
And with an endorsement like that, what kind of man wouldn't pull?
If you are in the business of distribution or retail consider the effect the internet is having on the future of your business. Purchasing offshore by consumers continues to grow, as do local online distributors who work on a low overhead model.
Brewing operations in this Brewery were finally stopped in 1877; and the site on which the Meadow Brewery stood, is now occupied by the General Offices of the Company. It may be of interest to note that the maximum number of quarters of malt which it was possible to mash in at one time was seven; a figure which of itself gives a very fair idea of the smallness of the Brewery."
Spring has finally arived. Sun, blooming flowers and singing birds - all this came back after a long hard winter. But spring also brings 12 wonderful new images from Belles´n´Whistles as well! And can there be anything better that close to easter than presenting these new stamps in a blog hop?
P.S. Jack Ketchum rules!
Happy decorating friends. You never stop needing your Mama. If your mom is still around give her a call. Better yet, give her a big squeeze and show her how much you love her.
I had never written anything like a book.
if not kept on the alert by activity- to make a beginning on lines of investigation which prove to be necessary as one writes,
All of these descriptions are from my Advocare Book!
Visitors were not permitted to take pictures or record video inside the prison. One guard, however, photographed the tour with a 7D, a 24-70mm f/2.8, and a long hood. That's the same setup I use at work, sometimes, to shoot in the newsroom. We chatted a bit about the camera. His Christian name is Sean, but I'm not sure of the spelling, and he wore a DoC sweater that presumably covered the badge printed with his surname. I asked him if he trained as a photographer, or if he just picked it up. He said he graduated from the New York Film Academy. He said he did mostly video, but he could do still photography as well. I asked him if he was hired to work as a DoC photographer. He said no. He'd applied to be a corrections officer, and still was.
It also made me realize that this is a lifetime thing. I can never completely relax about the food or the exercise. I need both even at target weight, thanks to lower metabolism. It also led me to change to a more body building approach from the get-go even though it is a little counteractive to a pure weight loss program. I want more muscle because it will help kick up the metabolism (even if it only turns out to be small% gain – I need every % I can get). Weight training also helps fight osteoporosis. Plus the endorphins from exercise help mood and energy. So does looking ripped.
I fumble with myself, as I walked out the door and, well, I don’t know what happened. I lived it, experienced it, but honest to god, nothing happened. I ate. I sat. I slept. And is this living? Is this javelin that has been metaphorically struck into my chest cavity going to be here forever? It is preventing me from living, while it merely allows for existing.
Fergi (and Both of Us)
cooler of organs
Things have gotten extremely exciting at our home. Every day there is something new that is discovered. For example, Hudson discovered his tongue 3 weeks ago as well as when you drool/spit a ton and then blow, fun bubbles come out of your mouth. The newest discovery has been his feet. It is absolutely adorable when he will kick his feet and then just stare at them forever. It’s the little things that are so very important.
Well, I think that’s just about all I have to say about Cujo the movie. Except, I do believe I promised you earlier one last comparison to the book that was a major difference. So this would be the part where I yell “Spoiler Alert”, for both book and movie. In the book, despite Donna’s heroic effort at the end to kill Cujo and save Tad, it is all just a little too late. Tad has already died of dehydration. In the movie, after killing Cujo, Donna carried Tad into the house, splashed his face with water, performs mouth to mouth, and successfully brings Tad back from the brink of death. Apparently the young boy dying at the end was just a little too bleak even for this horror movie. And what makes this difference even more interesting is that, Stephen King himself was offered to work on the screenplay for the movie, but he turned it down because he felt it would have been too tempting of an opportunity to change everything he felt he got wrong in the book (and for someone who has no memory of writing the book, you can imagine there might be quite a bit to “fix” in his mind). And yet, even though King didn’t want to give in to the temptation to “fix” the story… Whoever ended up writing the screenplay still felt that the ending needed to be fixed…
20% Waxes
It would be easy to go with a tried and true little black dress and look like everyone else, but I want a punch of color to help me stand out from the sheeple. Nicole Gill’s Elena corset is the perfect choice. The black lace, faux waspie embellishment around the waist will keep the boudoir foremost in everyone’s mind, while the startlingly dramatic burgundy maintains the festive appeal.
- Last 1.05 miles: 14:22, or a 13:41-minute mile, or 4.4 mph
I smoothed the surface and congratulated myself on a job well-done (mental state: smug)
the ocean and its salty cycle of life and death.
It meant that I spent a lot of time researching and trying to get my head around it before realising that I actually had no clearer idea about what I needed to do and the deadline was fast approaching! So I finally asked for help. And after a 30 second chat in which the task was explained in a slightly different way, all the pieces fell into place in my mind and the weight that had been on my shoulders for days miraculously lifted. If only I had asked sooner!
I have met Jill at BlogHer after her panel and was just delighted with her sweetness and all around general goodness. She was one of those "must meet bloggers" while I was there. As I am not "star struck" since I live in So Cal and they are a dime a dozen, I am, however, blog struck by some of my most favorite bloggers.
(featuring sorrowful slide guitar and a tired, mournful vocal)
When we arrived there were groups of people spread around the restaurant area and the bar was mostly full though it got much more crowded after 30 minutes. We did manage to find one seat and settled in to begin the event. Because the Phruit Phunk was listed as limited, I ordered a glass of it.. Any time something is limited at an event like this, it's a good idea to always start with it or else you'll miss out.
From: Eric Stander
I’ve already decided I’d like to run another half marathon again. Now that I proved that I really can run 13.1 miles, I want to do it again, and again. I loved the weekly challenges I posed to myself with every long training run, and I really loved the feeling of seeing that finish line come up. I want to experience that again. Unfortunately, my life won’t allow for more distance training this year–all the half marathons I’m interested in this fall are in October, and I can’t afford the training time with wedding preparations. So I’m already looking at Spring 2013, and possibly doing two (maybe the Carmel Half Marathon and the Kentucky Derby Festival Mini Marathon again?).
Your forefathers were privileged enough to have been invited into our country as guests many years ago, to work and live peacefully side by side of us, the innocent heirs of this Great Nation our homeland. Little did our leaders realise of the blood thirsty Islamic beast that they were allowing into our midst. You their murderous ‘indoctrinated’ Moslem decedents in this generation have decided that now is the time for you to rise up for Islam and reject us your generous hosts, and our civilized Judeo/Christian way of life and embark on a murderous path of war and conquest against us, raising the Islamic banner of Jihad (Holy War) with the ultimate aims and intentions in your warped backward psychotic Moslem minds of destroying our British way of life, taking our country over and enforcing an Islamic way of life - Sharia Law – upon this Nation, its people and our innocent decedents who are sleeping at this moment in time innocently in their beds, unaware of what horror is unfolding around them.
We should not be surprised that when we grow closer with the Lord, more and more challenges b/c the devil is going to try harder to derail us. But here’s what I say to the devil – back off!!!
Source: Fine Cooking
The first block focuses on true thoughts. I used a violin for this block because it is such a beautiful instrument. However, if it is not truly in tune, or the notes are not played truly, it can be quite painful to listen to! It's a reminder to me to only allow things that are true into my mind - not hearsay, or gossip or half-truth.
He ends by saying: '...although a feminist book it is not just for feminists', and it seems in fact that on Goodreads, where this review appears, the men are liking this book (first published by a feminist press) better than the women - Jim Murdoch gave it a rave review, and five stars. It kind of makes you wonder if, while many women have gone and distanced themselves from what they suspect men see as the taint of feminism, men have been busy assimilating the issues and have become pretty feminist themselves!
UNITED KINGDOM.
Monday 9th
If you want Jeff to be a Christian, turn to page 72. If you – sorry, my mind wandered a bit there. Back on track now.
It's the kitchen. The dishes are unpacked. Most of the pots and pans and utensils are unpacked. We have the microwave, the tea kettle, our brand new coffee maker (thanks, Andy, awesome Christmas present, btw).
Well dinner is almost ready and I can't really think of anything else to write anyway so buh-bye for now!
4. Ink. Ahh, assuming your Siamese twin likes to use fountain pens...they will need ink and ink is sexy.(yep, I said it) There are so many choices and the good news is, you can afford this. Noodlers has some awesome colors. Levengers is good. They are less expensive, but I like the Pelikan inks also. Buying tip: buy 3 or 4 in similar shades and give it that way. Blue-Blacks, Greens or even reds. Awesome gift. I have never heard a pen junky say "I have too many inks." That's just silly. Tons of choices here folks.
This is a big one, according to Rosen.
Meshchakova NM. Occupational risk factors and reproductive health of female workers engaged into kraft pulping. Med Tr Prom Ekol 2005; 12: 5-10.
I even had toys in boxes that I really wanted to play with. Still, I held out. The whole packaging issue became so important to me that I eventually started keeping the packaging of toys that I decided to open. It just felt wrong to get rid of it. Even if the price was now nearly worthless because the package was open.
balance sheet of realizations but a petition in bankruptcy as it was
Im always glad to take profit, but the stock then went onto hit the 50% Fib @ 33.36p, which would have been a return of 11.1% rather than 8%, but oh well, profit is profit.
If you die to soon, most people who love their families, want debts like lines of credit, loans, mortgages paid off relieving the survivors of those obligations.
Granulated sugar tops the cake
Funny that the first insert was a churn dash..
2) It’s harmless…
Check out Allure Quest Travel Experience on the web for all your travel needs – including analysis of destinations, videos and the latest travel news.
Anyway, even though the nursery isn't being re-assembled yet, we're already enjoying the glider. It's still in the family room, and I just love the polka dot fabric.
The University of Alberta Students’ Union in Edmonton installed a screen predicting arrival times last May, using scheduled data from three integrated transit authorities.
3. Fry well till well browned on both sides.
Rant over.....for now.......
Maybe the tough tits will be enough for me to actually post more than three times in a month and get my subscribers to a more respectible level like 70 or 71!
They taught me another difficult lesson, too – this one perhaps even more difficult. If I’m going to succeed in university – if I’m going to get the grades I want, and need to get into medical school – I need to stop prioritizing my writing over everything.
After the last time, not posting for quite some time, I promised myself I would not let so much time pass before posting here again. Yeah right, see how that one worked out for me!
My favorite way to cook spinach, and now Swiss chard, is to just saute it with a little olive oil. First, I slice some garlic in the oil and heat it slowly in a heavy frying pan. When the garlic is golden and sizzling, I take it out and set it aside. Then I sprinkle some crushed red pepper onto the oil and add the greens. Sprinkle a little sea salt on the greens and stir for about 30 seconds or till they start to wilt. Serve with the garlic pieces on top as a garnish, if desired. Absolutely delicious, and so very simple and easy.
He is young and active so it is a bit unusual.
Are they $8.00 well spent?
Kelly O'Donnell/Martha Ivery/6 other aliases has just pleaded guilty in Federal Court to ALL 15 COUNTS OF FRAUD (INCLUDING BANKRUPTCY FRAUD) SHE WAS CHARGED WITH!
The sentiment is from an old and retired set from Stampin Up. I used the direct to paper technique on the sentiment and distressed the edges.
This ghost that haunts these cliffs is strong
In his home, it was brought down and in awe we leafed through it, admiring the drawings. I was amazed; it brought back so many memories.
Cousin: Can believe you have been married that long?!?
Just over a month or so ago, she refused to stand, in Birmingham’s council chambers, to respect the actions of a British soldier who had proved his bravery against the Taliban's Islamoterrorism – that same terrorism Yaqoob has been defending, justifying, legitimising, rationalising, excusing, and sympathising with ever since 1998 – if not before.
ethiopia cried out
6. Walk a total of 500 miles: Made this goal when Mike and I would go on daily 3+ mile walks in the morning. We then moved to an area of town where that wasn't really feasible so if I walked 500 miles then it wasn't because I aimed to
Lil’ will power showin’
Also, check out the challenge at FCCB if you have not already participated. This week's challenge is Snow Fun. Include a snowman or snowflake on your project. As always remember to add a Cricut cut!
Kicking off with a groovy disco set from Breakbot, he smashed it and really got the spirits going with weather conditions deteriorating quickly. What happened next was absolutely out of this world as SebastiAn took the decks of the Sahara. WOW! This was one of the hardest pounding electro sets I have ever seen in my life. Intense pumping dark n dirty French electro sounds were shooting throughout the tent as SebastiAn was # 3 in my day one Top 3.
We ‘roared’ him to his feet as it is not sporting to shoot a loafing stag. He lept to his feet, snorting & steaming in the cold, extremely cross that a competitor stag had got so close to his patch. He stood there looking magnificent against the backdrop of the Highlands and I shot him through the heart.
Last thought of the day. Whoever came up with the great idea of "Spin" classes should be beaten. No, worse than that. They should be drawn and quartered.
Here's a fun little game I accidentally invented with the help of a few friends.
In the city centre of Trondheim Nattergalen can be found. Nattergalen calls itself a bar with a kitchen. As a bar, the place is interesting with many interesting wines and drinks on the menu.
However the 'session' beer served pints is still the king in the UK & will continue to be so, as I think the pint is deeply ingrained in British drinking culture. This new measure does not pose a threat to the pint nor the British pub, it is infact one of those welcome sideshows that will enable craft beer to blossom in the UK.
And for those who haven’t seen my face, ha ha.. some said my gravater is weird ok. here it is:….
Heads up whitey...You have no more form of protest or resistance...Even an ill conceived joke, although perfectly harmless, will be met with brutal force by the SAPS.
I'm very enthusiastic about this cover. It's all about the red and the render even though the door appears to be only pencilled in. There's good depth and animation in the composition of this picture. It all comes together perfectly with the title and the bared white teeth.
Okay here we have a beer from a Craft brewery in Tasmania...I always wanted to try Moo Brew's beers and stumbled across this one the other day at my favorite bottle shop here in the Newie area Warners At The Bay.
Now, to try and reassure us the government is to send us all a breakdown of how our tax money is spent. The patronising bastards! How many bureaucrats will it take to produce that? Will it include how much tax is wasted on pointless bureaucratic exercises such as sending us all a breakdown of how our tax is wasted? Will it include a breakdown of how much our sponging parasite politicians really cost us? Thought not.
He placed his other leathery hand on my head
As for what Bruegel wants us to think about his art, or what Majewski’s motivation’s are, or what he wants us to take away with us after viewing the film, I won’t venture a guess on either. This isn’t a film for everyone. In fact, I venture to say, that not many have seen it, or would want to. I’m not going to rate this film. Nor recommend it. Didion already did that. You should be able to make a decision to watch it from the trailer. It’s up to you.
Internet Millionaire Secret #1: Internet millionaires recognize that strategy should be the foundation of any marketing plan. It is critical to have a marketing strategy and not just jump into marketing techniques. For example, we don’t have to use mass advertising anymore because mass advertising doesn’t have strength because consumers have choices. You would have wasted valuable time and money if you used mass marketing techniques without first strategizing about the state of the market.
Diagnosis in alternative treatment uses mainstream diagnostic techniques and supplements them with thorough physical and psychological examinations.
Friday: Chicken Pot Pie
‘How much do I owe you?’ She asked, reaching into her purse.
And the girl around the corner sent him a
Registration for the K¹² Spring Online Expo, held April 24–27, closes tonight. Don’t miss out!
In 2011, I have a lot to look forward to. A potential visit from Joe's dear Nanny. Another visit from our dear Russian friends and a long overdue trip home to celebrate my parents' 40th wedding anniversary with the whole fam-damily, which I am praying will include my first meeting with my new niece. Living far away from the homestead has its challenges, especially when both families live in different parts of the country as is the case with both my bro and I. Add a family wedding in September to the mix (for them) and coming home in July for our 'rents poses a logistical issue and some family tensions. Praying for them on that one.
This is my interment. My body lays here
Leigh snapped back, bewildered that Devi could have known her thoughts.
Linds: *?*
When it comes to women’s rights, not all cultures are created equal, particularly those whose attitudes are frozen some time in the mid‑14th century. But we weren’t allowed to say that. Actually, we weren’t even allowed to think that. If you inhaled enough toleration of the intolerable, then you were well on your way to the opium of political correctness.
- 2 T. ground flax seed meal
But like a typical PAP, I turned away, I don’t want to know. I wanted to believe that “my people” were better than that. I think at our base, we are all tribalists because that is what we had to do to survive in our early human years. Instead of railing against racism, I think we should acknowledge that base human response and move on. Redefine how we see our tribes, or communities. It has already been done, most men think about women differently than they did 50 years ago, which given biological imperatives is pretty rapid change.
9. Everyday you spend in Office, you are driving the world closer to the brink of war and destruction.
his tail is of jet
For my money CITW is the best because of its ambition, scale and breadth of knowledge. I think CITW will find it's footing but because of the internet hype it already seems like a big deal which may or may not be to it's benefit.
When she was in the hospital, I was constantly by her side, just like she had been for me my entire life. I never wanted to leave her and I wanted her to know that I would be with her so she wouldn’t be scared. It got the to point where I would have to leave every 30 minutes because the emotional tole was unbearable. After about 2 days in the hospital, she couldn’t stay alert or even talk due to the pain of her liver failing. I don’t even think she could see me any more at that point. She was in so much pain. I wanted it to be over for her so she wouldn’t have to endure any more pain like she had her entire life from all her medical and emotional ailments. It wasn’t fair to make her suffer, but I guess there’s nothing else you can do for humans. She passed away at night when I had finally made it home to get a little bit of sleep. I remember running through the rain in the parking lot of the hospital to try and be there for her during her last moments. I had JUST made up my mind that I was going to be there, no matter how difficult it was for me. And yet she left me. She left me that night. My extended family were there for her, and I guess that brings me some comfort, but not much. I never wanted her to go without me, or without her being comfortable. All I ever wanted for her was to be able to finally be healthy one day and have the “grandbabies” she’d always talk about. And no one will ever know how hard it is to lose your best friend and mom and know that they’ll never see you graduate college, get married, have children, or anything else. Ever. My mom was the one person I loved more than anything in the world, and I miss her every single waking moment of my life.
One thing that was important to me when I started this blog was sharing modern birth stories.
1. Alex Grimaldis (BH) 46; 2. Emily Corrigan (U) 47; 3. Christianna Wymbs (BH) 48; 4. Alessandra Ricigliano (U) 51; 5. Daniela Leuthold (U) 56; 6. Morgan Goodman (U) 60; 7. Jeanne Steuerer (U) 61; 8t. Kim Bacon (BH) 63, Sara Mascia (U) 63; 9. Lauren Taub (BH) 69; 10. Erica Mack (BH) 72.
453920 Art dealers
Whate’er thou art, wher’er thy footsteps stray,
Miss the days when table tennis was the height of evening entertainment sophistication? Craving the simpler days when Trivial Pursuit was all you needed for a cracking evening? Then the Youth Club at Concrete is for you. Not only are they plying you with board games, table tennis and the like, oh no, they are also giving us retro 80s games (think Pacman) and retro 80s tunes (think eat your heart out Mark Ronson). Plus cheapo Italian meatballs… if that’s your thing.
Comments always welcome! Now I'm going to get to finishing up Yoshi. I am actually decently close to being done. My goal is to finish him up over break. We'll see if that happens!
I have it easy & have been blessed. But still:
Also, selective purchasing ordinances are not dead. New laws are being written which conform to the Supreme Court’s ruling, and which preserve the public’s fundamental rights of freedom of association and expression, including through what we buy.
I'm looking forward to more "modeling sessions" and getting my feet wet on a few fun projects. Anybody want to be my guinea pig?
3. Stir until chocolate is melted. Stir in sugar. Mix in eggs and vanilla. Stir in flour and nuts.
When Kai was about 18 months old, I got him a little stick and we would play street hockey in our driveway; I did the same for Kade. When we owned a house in TN we would sometimes play driveway hockey with some neighbors, and I would shoot a few tennis balls every day just to stay limbered up. About 5 years ago, the boys started to get more interested in the game and decided that they would like to take skating lessons. It was a gigantic fail, mostly because I was such an ass about it. They would go on the ice and struggle, and I would try to teach them how to skate like the wind, regardless of how unsure, frightened, uncomfortable, or apathetic they felt. It lasted three sessions, and then we had to quit for the sake of our sanity. They weren't ready, and I wasn't ready for them to not be ready.
They’re right about the biology. The “textbook” explanation, based on a higher relatedness of workers to their sisters than to their own potential offspring, no longer seems feasible. It posits that queens mate only once, but in reality they often mate many times, which destroys the asymmetry of relatedness that supposedly selects for cooperative breeding. Further, other species, like aphids, termites and mole rats, are eusocial but don’t show asymmetrical relatedness. Finally, lots of haplodiploid species (those in which males come from unfertilized eggs, females from fertilized ones) have asymmetrical relatedness but aren’t eusocial.
This feels like a fantasy cooked up to *really show those bastids* kind of thing. It feels very good to write, but doesn't actually work well on the page. It doesn't work well for the same reason most of the Lifetime movies don't work very well: they don't bear much resemblence to reality and and require so much suspension of disbelief you need to strap on bungee cords to read the damn thing.
A White Christmas was apparently had by most of Texas (aside from, of course, the City Back Home--it rained) with record snowstorms and blizzards in West Texas and even as close as Big Huge City and Ridiculously Large City Of Cowboys.
Model: 15403
Whether simple or profound..
him, to suggest that if young Bradley Headstone, when a pauper lad, had
“So too with Scripture. Often when people try to say what the Bible is about, they let their own mindset ride roughshod over what actually lies on the pages…Jesus, for example, was rejected by his contemporaries not because he claimed to be Messiah but because, in their view, he didn’t make a suitably messianic claim. ‘Too bad for God,’ they seemed to say. ‘He may want a dying Christ, but we happen to know that Christs don’t die.’” (4)
sizzix corner die
Ramon Rosario, 19, was part of a group of men who allegedly called themselves the “headshot committee,” who terrorized people in their homes during violent home invasions, reports The Palm Beach Post.
Update 3/19: I’m not the only one who’s tried expert groups. This post has better advice re: classroom management and giving students more of a set jigsaw structure (move to expert group, move back to home group, what to expect for transitions, etc). In my version, once students become experts, they can work individually if they want or find an expert – their call – so there’s a lot of movement, sometimes chaotically and excitedly.
I LOVE YOU! Jeannie
You can use this dough to bake loaves as well, as pictured below.
Please give me your ideas, names etc and add the details?
1/2 cup (7 ounces) dried currants (if not soft and pliable, soak in boiling water for 5 minutes, drain and pat dry)
The country succeeded in selling EUR 2.5 b (USD 3.3 b) of bonds on strong demand (Fxstreet/CNBC)
Mum perches at the back behind Dad.
11. Overcome them with love; and then they will be loving to you, and consequently lovely. Love will cause love, as fire kindleth fire. A good husband is the best means to make a good and loving wife. (9)
Wood burns salami, the sweet coaled
It was later thoroughly knocked through and given a more generally modern makeover, but never really seemed to find its feet, so in the current climate its ultimate closure came as no real surprise. Many of these pub company outlets in town centres seem to have struggled as they have been neither fish nor fowl, not modern enough to appeal to the youth market, traditional enough to appeal to the older drinker, or with enough emphasis on beer to attract the enthusiast, and not really doing anything as well as Wetherspoons.
I don’t believe a recall would serve the residents of our Road District and ask that you vote for me and the existing board members.
‘Every full moon Remus could overcome
we headed home.
With the money I paid I expected good results and the Clarisonic delivered. which is good news for the website i got it from because if it didn’t…… I would have thrown a hissy fit until they gave me my money back. I saw great results even after just 1 week. My skin was softer, and smoother. I had a raised scar under the skin by the side of my eye and it had been there about 3 months and in the month that i’ve been using the Clarisonic its gotten much smaller and less noticeable. I still get a few pimples but I’m okay with that. The Clasrisonic can’t do it all but it definitely does more than the DermaNew. It cost more but it’s worth it.
When we got home from the store it was already 2:00. Luckily there were leftover pitas and hummus and some bean sprouts ready to eat. I slapped a few tomato slices on the pitas and we had a sandwhich so good it could have been on any cafe menu. My son eats sprouts by the handful straight out of the fridge. He actually sneaks them and I pretend I don’t see him do it. He loves wayching them grow in the jar too. I only did this for the first time about a month ago and it’s something I can’t imagine not doing. A quarter cup of lentils makes about 2 cups of bean sprouts in about 3 days. I’ll order some alfalfa seeds soon and sprout those too.
2 tbsp unsalted butter
Or for example mr. Martyn doing a heartfelt Mr. Harper...
Asked to comment, Satan, from his villa in Vatican City, said, “Go ahead and think I am Allah Yahweh, go ahead and say Fulford is correct, that is fine with me — for I am my Name.”
Within the ecosystem
Fronted by the versatile vocals of Emily Armstrong, whose range can handle blues, soul, as well as unleash a gritty rock n' roll howl full of intensity. Besides Armstrong's amazing vocals, the electrifying band is also driven by Siouxsie Medley's guitar playing, a no non-sense style that blends melodic and heavy riffs into a perfect cocktail of hard rock.
This Year- to start promoting Tourism between South Africa and Malaysia. I will open a consultancy promoting both countries within travel agencies.
I don’t know how to do that quite yet. Nell’s dark and stormy skies as she watches a squall roll in over New Jersey. I see the comic book panels in my mind. I smell the rain. I wonder what she has in her goody bag. What pet she might have, what dangers she faces. That’s where her story starts.
2kg rhubarb, cut into 3cm chunks
Web: www.sknetservice.org
That's right; these are not ninjas in Zombie Vs Ninja. All that we have here are a bunch of pajama-clad clods jumping about, swinging their weapons and throwing their smoke bombs in the woods. Nope, even the guys that have "NINJA" written across their heads aren't ninjas. Not even a little bit - I'M more of a ninja than these guys!
5. What is the person doing?
One more thing. Thanks for the recommendation, Marlon Brown. I’m sure the boys will enjoy the wings when you bring them along once you guys get into town.
I loathe the computer as a reading instrument, but I make an exception for short story reading because of the vast number of excellent online magazines.
The original
We’d all like to grow more social businesses. After hearing about the positive effects that social media can have on our business, in terms of new customers, better word of mouth and brand perception, we’re sold on the idea. But that doesn’t mean we know what growing a social business truly entails. Sure, there’s the company Twitter account, but what does “being social” mean to every day operations? What does that look like on an internal level and what do you need to shift inside your organization to increase that sense of socialness with your customers and your employees?
THE SIMON & SCHUSTER - MARY HIGGINS CLARK AWARD
It clearly made a great impression. The beer that evoked those memories wasn't even the same beer, but maybe there was something about the house style, and the concentation of aromas as I breathed in that set off that little memory circuit in my brain. The whole reverie probably lasted for less than a second, before my conscious brain barged in shouting "WHOAH, DUDE! YOU'RE HAVING A PROPERLY PROUSTIAN MOMENT!". Stupid brain.
"Ow!! Ow! Ow!! I think I broke it!"
Brown sugar hair
I used a couple of sets from There She Goes - the super cute Birthday Bots and Numbered Days. The main image is part coloured with copics and part paper-pieced. I used a smaller present stamp from the same set, coupled with a dienamics filmstrip die to create a little "movie" of the present arriving just by stamping it as an outline inside each cell by masking off the others as I went along. Finished with the sentiment and a couple of drifting balloons.
there?
Think you've got it?
If you have ANY tips for me, resources, good blogs with tips, I would greatly appreciate them! About blogging, about making my own layout, about content, really anything that could help a new blogger.
Eventually I picked up a Faygo Candy Apple Red since I had never tasted it before and headed to the snack rack, only to realize that the foreign store clerk had been eyeing me the whole time, probably because of my demeanor looking into the cooler. The snack racks weren’t much better – off brand chips and pork rinds, un-refrigerated wines, and of course the wide array of candies behind the bullet-proof glass. A brother couldn’t even get some trail mix in there! I finally decided on the white cheddar popcorn (what better to go with my apple soda?) and headed to the counter. I took a second between the rude interchanges between me and the clerk to gaze upon the racks of cigarettes, expensive liquors, and the gang of scratch off tickets behind him, and it hit me – there isn’t a thing that’s good for me in here, and I’ve been going to places like these my whole life. I still decided to get a scratch off because – hey, why not? I’m buying a bunch of other terrible stuff, plus I could get rich here! -_-
Julianna C Hudgins Design Team.
A member of the NWC, who spoke with our correspondent on condition of anonymity, said the party would push for Azazi’s sacking.
We can use this system for people too, and performing these tasks on our own lives is commonplace whenever we hit a wall, but I want to posit that you should do it seasonally—just as you would do for your garden plants.
The world No. 2 cruised through the first set of a match that had been rained out Sunday, before falling behind 4-2 in the second.
"See my badge here says RN and that we haven't been ignoring you. You've been asleep."
acknowledged that she sometimes seems to use it as a shield, fending
And "shadowy group of conservationist saboteurs" is as one-dimensional description of a villain as I've seen in a while. It's actually a reason I'd reject this even if the writing was any good. Boring villains make boring books.
I have always wanted one of my very own.
3. Drama Queen No.2 has managed to survive a visit to the dentist and was able to communicate through the use of vigorous hand signals that, no she would not like two loose teeth just tweeked out – past experience having taught her that hesitation on this type of issue results in plier type instruments being thrust into her mouth.
I forgive you. (I John 1:9, Romans 8:1)
The only other thing I'll say is-- I really, really hope there is going to be a sequel to this one! As much as the end of the book made sense, I really want to see what happens next in Penna's life!
Training Test 1, I thought some of our best trots were in this test. I carried a dressage whip with me. I didn't have spurs on either. So I knew if I just had the whip in my hand that'd perk her up just a little bit. I still didn't want to mess with her cause she is just so tolerant of everything all day. And if I would have so much as lightly tapped her with the dressage whip she'd be running from it the whole test.
I bought this dress. It was outside of what I wanted to spend but I thought it was super great.
Today's WordArt request is from Kristen. She wanted to use it on her invitations to her 4 month olds dedication. Hope you like it, girl! Click on the image below to go to my box.net account to download the PNG file, and leave some love if you like my work.
She had this firm belief that it was critical to mimimize all refined flour, sugar, rice and completely avoid preservatives, at least until you were 12, then all bets are off. This might explain the Carl's Jr. wrappers we'd often find in our trash cans first thing in the morning. As annoying as this could be, and as begrudgingly as we ate our brown rice and non-instant oatmeal and made jokes about our dried fruits (want a date?), I knew deep down she was doing something right.
Poor Jessica Simpson. The unlucky-in-love singer’s debut on QVC midnight with her new accessories line was drawing a big thumbs-down from viewers, and after looking at some of the video clips, we had to agree.
Mix everything together in except butter.
Technique or genius; skill or a knack
Remember that wild butterfly we used to chase is missing you .
-Paper-
and i apologise if in this post, i offended anyone. it's not my intention to attack anyone (directly or indirectly) but it is mine to share my observations and experiences.
- It’s sort of bulky, but I kinda expected that.
White and cream... I need to be brave and face the monochrome...
I am, as last time, posting this as FLAC. This really needs official release and I do hope that if it ever comes to pass that this does get an official release, they don't use the raw material as-is but consider what the band is and present the record as such. I would expect BBC engineers probably have better tools at their facility than I do with regards to mastering, but then again, I don't lose David Bowie one-of-a-kind broadcasts either...
I just ordered Avon’s Advance Techniques new hair color that is promoted by Fergie. I actually just colored my hair using my Natural Instincts demi-permanent hair color ( I’m afraid of damage, cuz I have to keep coloring when those pesky grays poke out–I’m in my 20s!!!), but in a few weeks, I’ll have to re-color anyway, so I will try permanent again with the Advance Techniques to see if it helps! I hope so!
Last week he opened a present (his first such offense) and found a train. It was for Harrison. Noble loves trains. This particular train was Emery from Chuggington (Noble's favorite show.) He was devastated that this was not for him. Later when I asked him what Christmas was all about he said, "Emery."
Hot sexy man interlude: One evening, I listened to a salsa band and danced on a crowded patio with said hot sexy man. We were the only ones dancing merengue and cumbia, and I didn't care. Let a few Coronas be your inspiration, people. And perhaps animal print.
In November I planted some new ones on my deck, in a colour that I would only possibly ever consider for tulips - apricot. These are Apricot Beauty, a single early variety. On grey days, they are at their prettiest.
“Then we can skip it.”
That chicken salad was awesome. I spied some raisins in there and it had a bit of onion, which I love in chicken salad. The cucumber sandwich was good, and I couldn’t detect the mint, which was nice because I hate the stuff except in toothpaste and chewing gum. The pumpkin bread sandwich was really something, like a pumpkin spice cake with the most delicious filling of marmalade, cream, and walnuts. The maple-walnut scone reminded me of pancakes, and though it was tasty I think I prefer a more traditional scone for teatime. The other offering that day was a cranberry-orange scone. The profiterole, cream puff, and wedding cake were all right. The spinach brownie was like a crustless quiche, eggy and light.
It also raises the question of how we as a society value human life and whether in fact we have the right to place more importance on one baby’s life than another baby? Is it right to inject one baby with MMR to protect him from measles, using the body parts of a dead baby? Should one baby die to save another and what makes the child who receives MMR more important than the child who was used to make the drug? Would mothers even want it if they knew they were injecting their child with human remains?
Have you noticed how many lights are twinkling this year? It seems like there are more than in years past. Could it be the rainbow of colored lights has returned? I’m glad. The years of white only lights seems to have given way to the “new/old” colors.
She was startled awake when a shark struck the side of her face. Dropping into her lap, its one good eye stared vacantly back. The other had fallen off years ago. Natalie ripped headphones from her ears and glared at her sister. Lucy bounced in her booster seat and giggled.
Thank You Dear Heavenly Father for the immense love You clearly demonstrated in sending Jesus to be the propitiation for my sins, thus making me a participator in the divine experience. I’m most grateful for this glorious privilege, in Jesus Christ’s Name! Amen!
Diva ran in, remembering she forgot her jacket…Tragedy averted.
After graduation, Ari, like so many other Oak Park graduates that year, made the trip down to Champaign, IL to begin his undergraduate studies. At the University of Illinois, Ari excelled as a young advertising major, taking on duties as the Strategic Thinking Leader and, eventually, the Vice President of the University’s team for the National Student Advertising Competition (NSAC). He also became highly involved in his fraternity, Phi Kappa Psi, where he was an active volunteer and served as an officer on a number of committees, including time as the Rush and Social Chairman.
The main reason for buying it I suppose, would be the addition of a short story, called Dreams of the White Crow, which gives a little vignette into Ferelith's world...
Hugh's passion for his garden, his own food and his new business are invaluable, enviable and exciting. Hughsli is now stocked in various locations all over Adelaide, from Goodies and Grains in the Central Market, to Viva at Burnside Village and The Corner Store in Semaphore.
One of our first major accomplishments in life is learning how to walk. That moment when you are crawling on all fours, then finally decide to propel yourself upwards on wobbling knees — knees that still haven’t adjusted to the weight of your body. As you try to gain your balance, or as much balance as a baby could have, you take one staggered step with your right foot, then your left, then your right, and before you know it, you are walking! Or at least, staggering around the place.
“And so even though we face the difficulties of today and tomorrow, I still have a dream. It is a dream deeply rooted in the American dream.” – Martin Luther King Jr.
Huh? Arunk??? What was I saying....ah yes crappy trends rearing their ugly heads at SXSW, I'm noticing way more Hip Hop, way more electonica, and way more mellow ass crap that makes me sleepy. Maybe that's why I'm not falling all over....ZZZZZZ
Blogger who selected Indian Thalis for the their first week, can post other new dishes that were part of the thali for the second week.
The three of us are laughing as an irate looking Betty comes out through the toilet door holding a mop and bucket.
7. Co-ops: When you are uncertain how to teach a particular subject, instead of buying three different "how-to" books, hiring a tutor, and going crazy, why don't you consider starting or joining a co-op? A co-op can be as small as two families and as large as two hundered people. The idea is that you will take the resources you have (such as my collection of lessons on how to write creatively, or how to do a nature study) and someone else will take their knowledge (carpentry or algebra) and we take turns teaching our kids and each others as often as one day a week and as little as one day a month. I don't have to buy materials because either I or the other teachers already have them. Wonderful! It saves me planning time, as well as money, and a lot of stress (as long as it doesn't get too crazy, that is.) Usually the fees are reasonable. You will just need to call around. You can google your area to find local co-ops.
Hope you have a good weekend,
If your out in the stores this weekend - pick up a few supplies and stash them in a "secure location" in your home. (if you have kids - you know what i mean about a secure location - HIDE the supplies or they'll disappear :0) ).
I couldn't help but note your shade of melanin
Sara Elizabeth Timmons ... Irene
ABV: 4.6%
The dysphoria I used to feel when visiting a mall, seeing other women etc has almost dissipated. Sure I still want surgery, implants, FFS but much more at peace with myself. Liking more what I see in the mirror, finally reflecting who I really am inside.
Pink - is to match some fabric I have in my stash already.
On the front cover, we have….
Sibling Relationships Will Destroy You: Are there any good siblings or quasi-siblings in this show? Hwayoung disfigures her sister, Sena abandons her step-sis, Taemu covers up Taeyong's death and doesn't try to rescue him...yeesh. Schemers, the whole lot of them.
So many times, i wanted to puke as I heard the tales of how dogs were killed but, I believe I believe the slaughter of cats is another terrible end.
My favorite contestant so far is Kellie. I think we would be fast friends.
Chase your dreams.
Roustabout may become the next hot job in New York —with modern versions of scenes from classics like “Giant” and “There Will Be Blood” coming to life across the Southern Tier.
The reason we're here sounds sort of egotistical. It’s to satisfy ourselves. I came about because I wanted to satisfy myself. But then again if I wasn’t here there would be no me to answer that question. Does that make sense?
I have lived to behold man burst forth and warlike America rise,
Art panels were created from enlarged photographs taken of a Georgetown garden and custom outdoor mirrors visually expand the space. The dated scrollwork was cleverly hidden by a series of pedestals and benches that create a feature wall and add to the intimacy of the space.
Then, the real kicker. Lisa and I both just happened to be invited to speak at a writer's conference in Arizona (ANWA). This was October of 2006. Since the conference set up and paid for our travel arrangements, Lisa and I sat next to each other on the plane and spent a lot of time together. I did my best to craftily hypnotize her into wanting a book from me.
It's always weird to move on... even when you're ready, and even though you're kind of not ready. :o) But it's good.
“That is what we call a Freudian slip,” she said. “He thinks he serves the government.”
13. Simpleton
This was a little sobering to me - but motivating as well. It can be hard to remember the praise when life is staring you down and around every corner is a hill or a mountain to climb - but I am so blessed and have so much to be grateful for.
If this slew of measures left any lingering doubts in the minds of Whites considering Flight, the 'War on Poverty' surely crushed them. Giving the least able blacks cash pay-outs, free housing, and free food in exchange for blessing us with as many low-ability illegitimate children as they possibly could (who would become low-ability adults) signed the death warrant of urban America.
“I’m sorry,” he says. “I meant no offense. I’m just not used to it yet, I guess.” He pauses, then shakes his head ruefully. “I never wanted to share you with anyone. Now I suppose I don’t need to worry about that, at least.”
Can’t you say it with a happy smile?
Chris Rock (and now you realize that I mentioned him in almost every post about comedy I ever made. I like the dude, it's not like I have a scrapbook full of pictures of us encircled in hearts and wedding pictures I downloaded from the web but with the heads replaced with Chis and mine's. such a book doesn't exist under my bed... SHIT! I'll be right back, I need to... relocate something...) his speaking style emulates that of a preacher that is why it's natural to see him well dressed in a tux or something similar on stage doing a standup. It just feels right.
Chag Sameach to all with aloha from our Seder table to yours.
After my last post I had a few emails asking about the "eyes" in the tile. I've drawn these since I was a child and I'm sure there must be a million other individuals who do the same thing, but as I haven't seen instructions formalized anywhere, I thought I'd answer the emails with this:
Renters should also spend an option charge after which it the lease top quality. The option cost is really a set amount the tenant pays the vendor. When, after the actual rent time period, the actual tenant purchases the house, the option cost gets area of the deposit. When the renter doesn’t purchase the house, the option cost becomes income for that vendor. Rent rates tend to be a sum slightly over the common rent, using a a part of those funds heading towards a down payment. new homes.
When Hanson said, “I didn’t want to make this a racial thing,” and “I listen to her all the time,” she violated the First Law of Lying: Plausibility. I doubt very much that Hanson ever a fan of Schlessinger. Her claim reminds me of the dirty trick campaigns of leftists who claim to be staunch Republicans, and who then either take leftwing positions (to try and make them look acceptable to conservatives), or who act “racist,” in order to try and discredit the Tea Party, Rand Paul, et al.
Plain speaking from Governor Sarah Palin on the unholy alliance between well-connected businessmen, campaign contributions and corrupt politicians..on both sides of the aisle.
Nothing too major but who doesn't love beignets?!
It’s only you,
My favorite of the chicks is my pretty Black Australorp (1 1/2 weeks old). They are one of the quieter chicken breeds and are good layers too. The yellow one is a cross between Rhode Island Red and Americauna. Americauna lay a blueish green or pale pink egg while the Reds lay brown so it will be interesting to see how her eggs turn out.
The border punch is Martha Stewart and Spellbiners used are Labels no. 10 and Lacy Circles.
Seventeen years later, a Columbia University graduate, Barack Obama, took a $13,000-a-year job in the Chicago organization Alinsky had founded.
(is a strong one)
Critiques can be a double-edged sword at times, tho. What one reader determines as a problem area, another will take no issue with. In the end, you may be left wondering who's right. Perhaps you see the merits of both sides--so you don't know what the heck you should do.
H - And what circumstances would those be?
"Fort a girl that claims you are seeing someone or interested in someone you are on here an aweful lot....rather odd and shady for you to be doing so when you SAY you are seeing someone? Underminded."
Just as cops like to use the dysphemism “ring” to mean “suppressed business”, so they employ the euphemism “proactive” to mean “predatory”. Police departments all over have discovered that criminal accusations are a valuable way to enrich themselves at the expense of the public, so naturally they’re upset that people are starting to make it more difficult for them by avoiding the “suspicious” behavior of carrying the currency of the nation in which they live.
Clear micro beads
1/2 lb. fettuccine, uncooked
Davis’s parents were vaudeville dancers. As an infant, he was raised by his paternal grandmother. When he was three years old, his parents separated. His father, not wanting to lose custody of his son, took him on tour. Davis learned to dance from his father and his “uncle” Will Mastin, who led the dance troupe his father worked for. Davis joined the act as a child and they became the Will Mastin Trio. Throughout his career, Davis included the Will Mastin Trio in his billing. Mastin and his father shielded him from racism. Snubs were explained as jealousy, for instance. When Davis served in the United States Army during World War II, however, he was confronted by strong racial prejudice. He later said, “Overnight the world looked different. It wasn’t one color any more. I could see the protection I’d gotten all my life from my father and Will. I appreciated their loving hope that I’d never need to know about prejudice and hate, but they were wrong. It was as if I’d walked through a swinging door for eighteen years, a door which they had always secretly held open.” The Army assigned Davis to an integrated entertainment Special Services unit, and he found that the spotlight lessened the prejudice. “My talent was the weapon, the power, the way for me to fight. It was the one way I might hope to affect a man’s thinking,” he said.[8]
Ja’s defense:
nurse got us lost
2. I like the fact that there are reasonable alternate love interests for both Mr. Thornton and Margaret Hale. Although Margaret never takes Henry seriously as a suitor, the audience recognizes that he is handsome and intelligent. He represents the kind of person Margaret might be expected to marry, if Thornton weren’t smoldering in the background. Henry’s not slimy like Wickham or a buffoon like Mr. Collins in Pride and Prejudice. He’s a little stuffy, but perhaps like Darcy, he could be softened by the love of a good woman.
Don't wallow in DOOM that hasn't bloomed yet--
So I’ve been busy with my other blog and other stuff since last Thursday, that’s why I didn’t have the time to blog. Today is a Wednesday and I’ve got nothing to do, so I decided to just blog and go to the bookstore later this afternoon.
Actually, I've been really tired since lunchtime. I don't know quite why, maybe it's the damp and dreary weather, because Dilly says she's tired too with no particular reason. I went to sleep for a while this afternoon, curled up in an armchair (and woke with indigestion as a consequence) and it took me ages to get going again. And now, honestly, all I can think of is going to bed. I went to make some coffee, in the hope of it waking me up a bit, but couldn't be bothered when I discovered I had to grind more beans (I usually grind enough for two or three days at a time) so made Earl Grey fumé instead. And if I'm too tired to use an electric grinder, perhaps bed is the best place for me.
That is my “bizarre” and dangerous idea. And please remember, our parks and lawns are actually SAFER now than they were when we were kids. Crime is DOWN since the mid-’70s and all of the ’80s. (Here is an article about how crime is down, but perception of crime is up.)
I took out my BB to see the request from Marvin;
Hurley-"And why should I trust you? You murdered Libby and Ana Lucia."
Now she has gruesome nightmares every night—reliving the horrific crime that she witnessed. The man in black, all the blood and screams and that metallic wrong smell…. She can’t tell anyone what really happened that night because what she did is almost as bad as what she witnessed.
Canadian brands entering the U.S. market do not promote themselves as being Canadian because it is definitely not a selling point for American shoppers. As long as customers like the store, service is good, brand means something to them and the price is right, then these are definitely selling features that are valued in America, as well as worldwide (Flavia Fagnani).
Visitation will be held at Toynton Funeral Home, 328 Kenosha St., Walworth, WI on September 15, 2010 from 4:00-8:00 P.M. Memorial service will be held at Fontana Community Church, 275 Kinzie Ave., Fontana, WI on September 16th at 11:00 A.M. In lieu of flowers and because of Melt’s love for children and Lake Geneva, a memorial fund has been established at Holiday Home Camp for economically disadvantaged/at-risk-youth (P.O. Box 10, Williams Bay, WI 53191).
You should come very close.
While the stories run the gamut from an alien-filled space opera to a quiet story of love in a separate dimension, all four of the stories focus less on technology or exploration, and more on the humanness of the characters and the power of thinking your way out of a tight spot.
suit his character in almost every movie he does,” remarks Sachiin.
3. Create a NEW blog posting with your creation for this C.S.D. challenge on your blog and tell your followers and readers about this challenge, the Blog Candy and our May sponsor. Be sure to have a link leading back here.
In this photograph, Park Yoochun and Han Jimin are in a cable car, with an affectionate pose. Park Yoochun is wearing a royal blue shirt, and Han Ji Min is in pink, creating a beautiful atmosphere. The two people, who are playing the role of Lee Gak and Park Ha in the SBS drama “Rooftop Prince” give out a strong image of two lovers, which attracts even more attention.
25 Save now, I pray, O Lord;
Welcome to the blog hop for the NoelMignon February kit, "Truly Scrumptious"! Let's play a little word scramble game, shall we? As you can see, there is a letter showing in my sneak, and there will be letters in everyone's sneak peek. Here are the rules:
The doctor decided that with the symptoms Hubby had, it might be meningitis. We told the doc that Hubby had just been out of the country, but he never bothered to do any blood tests. All he did was a spinal tap, said no, Hubby didn't have meningitis, and didn't bother to look and see if he had anything else. He said Hubby had the flu and told him to go home and alternate taking Tylenol and Ibuprofen.
FAB Alliance is hosting FREE CONCERTS FOR KIDS beginning this FRIDAY, APRIL 20, 2012, 10AM-11AM- with live performances for children outdoors at the new Putnam Triangle Plaza, crossing Fulton Street and Grand Avenue in Clinton Hill, Brooklyn. There's a free concert for kids each month, April-September. (Schedule below)
After the race I walked back to the car. All participants got the medal above which I was so proud of! They are shaped in wedges and will form a perfect circle after the next three years of Sedona races. How cool is that? I headed back to the hotel, showered and threw on some yoga pants and sweater. I was grateful for such a hot shower with plenty of pressure. After I picked Athetica up and we went to lunch at a funky little diner that is decked out in space ships and aliens. Despite the kitschy decor they have the best burgers and beers. They are also open later than any other place in Sedona.
Turn the old tenantry away;
Have the Government and University Authorities acted?
We have loved being home. I know I say this every time Levi has a visit home, but it’s true. Our joy is complete when we are together as a family. There’s not really a whole lot of “new” news to report on, other than the fact that our little Levi loves to be home and is playing as hard as he can. He’s enjoying being able to get out of the house every once in awhile, and was even able to cheer on his Fort Wayne Komets last Friday night during an evening out with our great friends the Bennetts. We don't really know yet what the plan moving forward will be; as of right now, we are still planning on taking Levi down to Riley next Tuesday for his bone marrow tests. From there, the doctor should be able to advise us on how we proceed.
centered, stubborn and quick to practice opportunistic cruelty to his oldest allies if that advances his political career.
Star bright
How have you seen love heal tough issues in human experience – bodily, emotionally, socially, politically? The tough issues of life are best addressed by God. That does not mean that we will escape them, but it does mean we can endure those tough situations that life presents because it is to the Lord we turn (1 Peter 5:6-7; cf. 1 Corinthians 10:13). Without having one to whom we can go for guidance, the proper solution will be out of reach. With regard to politics let us note that when people align themselves with God and His policies then political alignments are not so nearly as strong. If one were to have the same passion in Christianity as they do in politics the world would be turned upside down! In fact, it would be best if our “political” affiliation said Christian.
“I should say not. Forgive me, Mr. Tibbs, but he appears, by all accounts, to be quite mad.”
It's taken a lot of umming and ahhing to decide whether to get it done, and then where and what get done.
This will shutdown your computer.
And here is the finished fairy. Even though I used the baby oil my glue pen still works for adding glitter to the wings. Have fun layering colors to create new ones. You are save combining colors as long as you use colors next to each other on the color wheel. Eg. Use purple to cool down a red because red & blue make purple so purple is next to red on the color wheel. So is orange so you use orange or yellow to warm up red.
This weekend, the Original Six of us (minus one) got together for the first time in almost a year. I would post pictures, but we forgot to take any because we partied like there was no end to Spring Break. And by party, I mean we sedately talked and played Ticket to Ride and Pinochle. While drinking diet soda and eating junk like diet soda and Panda Express.
1/2 tsp carrom seeds (ajwain)
And I get that white walls would have made the whole room overly bright and rather stark. I honestly don't know what I would have put on the walls to go wth the yellow, but it wouldn't have been this color. Probably one of the reasons I'm reluctant to decorate with yellow though I love it so much.
My husband has a spinach salad today topped with a cucumber X and heirloom tomato slices. At the top right is white bean bruschetta with tomatoes, fresh basil, garlic and red wine vinegar. At the bottom right is a cup of mini carrots and a piece of purple cauliflower in the middle and blueberries around the cauliflower. All 3 lunches today are packed in Easy Lunch Boxes.
(I promised myself early on if less than 15 people made
What can you create with a travel theme? Maybe a bon voyage card, or a scrapbook page about a special journey?
as it teaches us to grow without choice;
A couple of things to note about this change:
So in her memory, I thought I'd post some old pictures of Brooklet (because let's not forget that she is the first person who ever called me Brooklet) and Anna. These are in no particular order, and none of them have captions right now. I may go back and caption them if I have more time one day. For now though, I think the pictures themselves speak for our friendship. I don't think they need to be in order or captioned for people to understand that.
from this world, and bring me nearer to God.
Insanity… is this something you have a personal familiarity with?
2 eggs, slightly beaten
Something is amiss and people have taken great pains to keep the facts of this a secret.
Finally, the 'devil' was lured close enough to be shot, and at the denouement it was revealed to be an unexpectedly large specimen of a creature not generally encountered in those parts. But what exactly was that creature? Only at the end was its English name finally given, and it proved to be a species that, as a young child, I had never heard of before – the wolverine.
Living with one foot in each world, Karou has never really known which one is her true home.
Head brewer Ian Burns (pictured above with a bottle of the new beer) told us “Wojtek the bear was discovered as a cub in Iran by Polish troops as they travelled through the Middle East to join the allied forces. He is known to have drunk beer and enjoyed cigarettes with the soldiers. He was officially enlisted and given the rank of Corporal to allow him to travel to Italy where, at The Battle of Monte Cassino, he helped move artillery shells to assist the soldiers.”
With my job change, came a change of school for Madison and Olivia. I'm still in awe of how well they did with the transition and how much the LOVE their new school. Plus, I'm in the classroom right next door to them and our paths cross constantly throughout the morning...which all three of us are LOVING!
An assessment confirms she is okay, but will no doubt feel the pain of yet another compounded fall tomorrow. The lights are dim however there is a light that fills the room.
Survival. In this paragraph the provisions of the effect of termination, secrecy, non-use of the technical information and non-use of the patent sections of the agreement are specifically noted to survive the expiration or termination of the agreement, to the extent permitted by the applicable governmental laws.
All essential vitamins are important for digestive health, just as they are for the rest of your body, but some play specific roles in digestion. In most cases, you can get the nutrients you need from a healthy diet, but it may not hurt to take a multivitamin supplement and an extra supplement of vitamin D.
I was thinking about paint, cause I´m a painter first, but this GHQ model had to be completely assembled first. The tiny instructions and the strange (for me) naval terms (and in English… I speak freaking Spanish) were intimidating. So I went online for some clues and got a nice idea of how the ship actually looks before building it. Hint, hint, hint.
The American bark Carrolton made a most picturesque entry into port last Friday, but she did not look so well yesterday morning when she was afoul of the battle-ship Oregon. The red-stack tug Sea King separated the two vessels and the Carrolton is again at her anchorage. As the Carrolton was making the Golden Gate the moon broke through the clouds and showed her the way in. She was brought to an anchor off Folsom-street wharf, but during the night fouled her anchor. The turn of the tide set her adrift, and the first thing the crew knew about the accident was when she bumped up against the Oregon. Neither vessel was damaged to any extent and the Carrolton will dock to-day to discharge her cargo of coal.
Does writing–or any expressive art–grow more challenging with age? It seems to me that the older one gets, the heavier the weight of experience that saddles each word, each brushstroke, each note. How can any sentence avoid the force of the existence that gave it birth? How is this not overwhelming?
Enjoy~
This fine oil painting is by artist Ellen Gavin and was painted in 2002. Titled: "Precursory Fidget" this canvas captures the pre-race tension and "riders up" in the Paddock right before a race at Radnor.
Dies: Round & Scallopped (Nestabilities)
Just last month, on 8 February 2012, a NATO air strike killed several children in the eastern Kapinsa province of Afghanistan, with “young Afghans of varying ages” identified among the casualties. Similar strikes were responsible for the murders of nearly 200 civilians last year alone. Furthermore, in less than ten months from 2010 to early 2011, well over 1,500 Afghan civilians were killed by U.S. and NATO forces in night raids, a brutal occupation tactic that has been embraced – along with drone attacks – by Barack Obama. According to a September 2011 study by the Open Society Foundation, “An estimated 12 to 20 night raids now occur per night, resulting in thousands of detentions per year, many of whom are non-combatants.”
Mommy Dearest Style
LIPSTICK: Glam Affair ~ Vanity Lips 03
16- Nudo 6.28
The fist, a standard deviation of space.
There might be a few more, but these are the ones that come to mind. And it’s true that most of these are approximations; it would probably be difficult for anyone who doesn’t spend a great deal of time with him to make out what he’s saying.
It was a feature I wanted to use for my Gallery so I could show my images in a similar way. To do this on Dreamweaver I had to expand the width of the container so I could fit all my images in each set on each page designated, so the images could then be viewed from scrolling from side to side.
Across the street to Ziad’s bookstore
As I previously mentioned, I was going to use this room to
My raised beds are built, filled, and planted; seeds sprout in flats, and we’ve begun preparing the field that will be the veggie patch. If all goes well (this is also the season of tractor repair as things break or malfunction periodically) Brad will put the sweet corn in the patch today, while I am once again headed for market this afternoon, with eggs, cornmeal, grits, and polenta. Happy Beltane!
In Daniel Roth’s current project on view at Donald Young Gallery, the story of the Cabrini Green Forest comes into being through multiple forms of documentation. According to Roth, the mythical forest exists in a tunnel which connects the Metropolitan Correctional Facility in downtown Chicago to the Cabrini Green Housing projects. In the exhibition, the dark undercurrents of societal relations become caught up in a literal architectural schema, a literary technique made famous by Franz Kafka. Roth presents his fantastic story in a rather straightforward manner. As the modern precision of the correctional facility is reduced to crumbling bricks by the toils of age, an opening in the basement reveals a well kept secret, a system of criminal exchange planned long ago and carried into the present, a tunnel.
Her feet fall perfectly in line with his
The card base is a 6" x 12" piece of card stock folded in half.
There will be surprises. You’ll be learning about how your wife reacts to things you’ve never tried before. Sometimes it will be wonderful and other times it will be dreadful. Consider it all a learning experience.
“What are you thinking about?” asked The Blonde.
Remain objective. State the problem and the effect the problem is having. This will help the employee understand the ramifications of his or her behaviors or actions.
Thank you Carol for the wonderful ,amazing goodies!
I have chosen lace-dies/punches-ribbon for my combination and used my new Tilda. Not the best colouring but off colour this week. Normally I would go back and try again but I just did not have the energy.
There are many important factors to be kept in mind before you build or buy a new house for your family. Planning should be done very properly because this is mostly a lifetime purchase. Few of the potential factors are listed below that can help in searching for a perfect home for you and your family.
I can't believe it's been so long since I've posted. The last few weeks before I left for vacation were so hectic, I couldn't get everything done that I wanted. But the best news is, my black hair is gone!
Last night was 1st Thursday in Fayetteville. No Underground. I miss it. I miss the other artists. Saddness.
Welcome to another week of Mojo! This week we've got a simple sketch that lets you have a little fun with those border punches and dies that are so popular right now. As always, if you don't have a particular shape, feel free to substitute with the supplies you have on hand. The most important rule is to have fun!
Perhaps it was because of the frequency jammers used for the first time in a Malaysian rally. This is one of the reason that Bersih failed to disperse the crowd because the message did not reach down to the crowd. I made my way to Masjid Jamek to pray.
With the breadth of heaven betwixt you;
The recipe suggests serving with a smoothie for a healthy breakfast. I found they tasted good with a bit of light cream cheese. Next time I make these I will probably use less ginger and add a bit of agave nectar just to bring the sweetness up a bit.
It's egregious that this paper, with all of its noise (it is very noisy), Sturm, and Drang, made it into any journal. Nothing has changed in two years. It's still indefensible to rely on this study as "scientific proof" of anything more than evidence of the continued desperation of a small, loud group of proselytizers for whom belief is more important than science. SafeMinds actually summarizes the study as finding "increased brain growth" and links that to putative correlations between large brains and autism. Three monkeys. One. Two. Three. That they would juxtapose this flimsy paper against the weight of a mountain of solid scientific findings from several branches of research and consider it a sort of scientific grail for their "side" speaks powerfully to their bias and reliance on belief.
They are offering our readers a discount too!
I think I’ve woken up on the wrong side of the bed today. I feel unmotivated and snappy. Having a broken night’s sleep probably has something to do with that I guess. Sophie was very wakeful last night and I don’t really know why… Teething? An upset belly due to her starting on some solids? Sleep cycles changing? It's only half-way through the day and I've already tripped over one of Grace's dress-up costumes and landed flat on my back, hopped into my car after grabbing a few items from the supermarket only to discover I'd rudely left my empty trolley at the check-out and had to re-settle Sophie during her naps more times than I care to count.
That's right, dears, today we are heading to the vast continent of Africa (dabbling a bit in India, but remaining mainly in Eastern Africa for all intents and purposes). I am going to teach y'all how to make the basic of all basic food necessities to the African peoples...well, aside from rice, which naturally is the staple of most of the world's diet aside from western nations. That and tea. Why didn't we inherit the rice-and-tea-fetish? Not sure.
Summer really happened. It really exists.
I really hate when the time changes in October, when the days are shorter and the nights are longer, traffic sucks, the days seem so short, Winter is just not for me! But when March comes around and its time to change the clocks again now that I LOVE! Days are longer, its a sign of Spring! I enjoy time with my family more, spending time outside the house,watching them play on the front yard, traffic is so much better, I can actually get home during day light, so this week I am grateful for the time change! I love it!
The author of these lyrics was delighted by the idea. “That’s great, that is!” he exclaimed. “We could invite the press round and get some good publicity about our marriage for a change.”
In an interesting Wall Street Journal article, “What’s Wrong With the Teenage Mind?” the author referred to a study that suggests that adolescents “aren’t reckless because they underestimate risks, but because they overestimate rewards—or, rather, find rewards more rewarding than adults do.” The reward centers of the adolescent brain are activated with an intensity greater than that of the adult brain. Think of first love, the forbidden fruit of sneaking a smoke, putting the pedal to the floor of Dad’s car, etc.
Di has come up with the suggestion of my bloggy buddies coming along on the big day and using their trimmers to form an arch instead of swords! I personally think she is just wanting to use up her snippets as confetti!
Striving to be something I'm not
The show did not even crack the Top-30 of the Nielsen Ratings until its 3rd season.
make the Galactic presence known on a worldwide scale until everyone is
See you tomorrow for the opening of Challenge 21!
Despite what the nuclear industry tells us, building enough nuclear power stations to make a meaningful reduction in greenhouse gas emissions would cost trillions of dollars, create tens of thousands of tons of lethal high-level radioactive waste, contribute to further proliferation of nuclear weapons materials, and result in a Chernobyl-scale accident once every decade. Perhaps most significantly, it will squander the resources necessary to implement meaningful climate change solutions. (Briefing: Climate change – Nuclear not the answer.)
- My wife says: I want hairy man to win.
The weather seems to have evened off. Though clouds remain, they hold none of the anger of nature they roared with this morning, that and there are fewer of them. All good for a pleasant afternoon and on into evening.
1 bunch of thin asparagus
Soul of Christ, be my sanctification.
With a long serrated knife, cut both cakes in half horizontally so that each cake forms two layers.
I was just thinking about the difference in quality of those nights when you don't have to work the next day, and those nights when you do. Somehow, your subconscious always seems to know that you have to get up early the next day, even if you aren't actively thinking about it. I fell asleep on the couch at 8:30 last night, yet did so feeling like I had all the time in the world. Tonight it's a completely different feeling, and it's only 7:00.
Am here, am here
Before I could answer two more of my brothers entered the bathroom to see what was going on. Then my 13 year old cousin Monica ran in. Then Uncle Bill popped his head in. Then another cousin. I stood there naked in front of an audience of curious people. I was mortified and embarrassed, covered in cold induced goose bumps, a knot forming on my head where the glass hit. I immediately became aware of my just-hitting-puberty-body and who was looking at me. I started to feel feint.
So, what’s it like being a published author? you ask. Has my life changed any since I published my book?
“Part of it’s missing.”
Do you think David Cameron and the rest of the tory cabinet should be made to publish details of exactly how much each one earns. Or should be left as a private matter. Would you give him the thumbs up ,or thumbs down regarding this issue. May be your unsure perhaps your 50/50. Let us know what you think?
The ancient warriors, the night before the battle, enjoying themselves, because they knew that the next day, might be dead.
He did explore his own connection to the sacraments. He may have given his child impromptu communion and, at least by Tim Powers’s account, considered that he might have the same capacity to give confession. Still, these practices were inconsistent at best and lacked the constancy and depth characteristic of religious practice. They were treated by those around him as signs of his eccentricity and, to some extent, his unwillingness to push further in that behavior indicates he, on some level, capitulated to this ‘Dick-the-eccentric’ characterization.
Taking all that into account, I was greatly intrigued by Mr Whitehouse’s quote mentioned above, which has got me thinking.
Later, Richie works out at the station listening to the news announce a new special narcotics bureau. Chief Toback comes to see Richie, and tells him "a detective without the support of his fellow detectives, can't do much."
Don’t tempt me. I want to know the deep details. I don’t just want to skim the surface. I want to watch you shower. I want to gaze at you bathing. This isn’t just about seeing you covered in suds and bubbles this is something more. Do you look at yourself before or after getting into the shower? What clothes do you take off first?
Otis, however, cried whenever they got near. Taking their picture with them was an act of child abuse, according to him! But who doesn't have a picture of their screaming kid with some huge dressed up character?
The view is of Dromana pier reaching out to Port Phillip Bay.
Photo: J. J. Murphy and spouse.
I don't see myself hunting anytime soon but I'd like to be good enough that I could hunt if I needed to.
But all those island mysteries were still there. Some audience members have said that by not explaining the deepest mysteries of their show, the writers of Lost took the path of least resistance and performed one long con on millions of viewers. Others realize that since they wrote mysteries so deep, the writers rendered explanations irrelevant – asking “What is the island?!” became equivalent to asking “What is The Force?” in relation to Star Wars (i.e. something you just don’t do).
The only option therefore is to increase taxes on the 47%. The problem is that it’s horrible politics; it backfired splendidly when John McCain tried to frame tax cuts for the middle class as welfare, and it will continue to backfire. To begin with, the income tax liabilities of the 47% aren’t erased by fancy accounting and off-shore accounts – they’re zeroed out by the standard deduction and credits like the EITC and Child Tax benefits, benefits which many more than 50% of householders rely on. Forcing the 47% to put “skin in the game” will mean that the taxes of the 53% will go up – and that provokes a quick backlash. Finally, the reality is that 73% of the 53% who do pay income taxes owe more in payroll taxes, which limits how much they actually care about that tax.
I.G.T Toscano
The former has called for the word “pariah” to be removed from the novel or for its withdrawal altogether from the syllabus.
Why is the Super Mario Bros. theme so perfect for SMB? It has a lot to do with the scale chosen, the melody, the tempo with its exciting beat, and it’s octave. I have learned enough to understand this, but there is something about the structure as well. There is something about SMB’s music that makes it perfect. Perfect enough that if you meet an Italian Plumber with a red t-shirt and blue jean overalls you instantly start da-da-da-dadump-da’ing in his face and making the walking sound as he waddles down the street.
It is also, of course, true that the establishment of the Assembly is a more significant event than merely changing the way in which legislative powers are transferred from Westminster. The current referendum was therefore always likely to invoke less passion.
During WIFYR I was in the fabulous Martine Leavitt's class. I learned a lot, but one of the best things for me was a discussion on drafts. She mentioned that Cynthia Leitich Smith writes her first draft then destroys it--as in gone. Deleted. Poof.
The new LS9 6.2L supercharged—the standard engine in the 2009 Chevrolet Corvette ZR1—is a technology marvel and the most powerful regular-production engine ever offered in a GM car, capable of propelling the ZR1 to a top speed of over 200 miles per hour – from GM Performance Parts.
This sounds like it might be a bad thing but we already build social machines of this type: think of a jury of peers in a courtroom trial:
However with ICS, they seem to have faced the challenge and they had to delay the original roll out plan. The much awaited ICS updated for the Arc and newer phones were due in April was delayed, and now only the newer Arc S and the Neo V and Ray got the update, while the older models only getting June or later.
Make them think the Holy Church has moved on
Status: INACTIVE – INCARCERATED
Ah yes maybe that's true, maybe it is only human beings who they want to intermix, indeed, in reality, their target is even narrower than that, they only want their meting pots in Europe or North America, but certainly no-where else.
Because you see, back in about 1975 there was little Shawn Gorman and the PS 130 chimney. And the story about what Shawn did that morning never made the headlines, because no one really saw what he did except us. And we knew better than to call the police.
It is the same with his photographs or the Fed Ex boxes. For his abstractions (which we don’t see in the LAX show), Beshty’s actions in the darkroom move according to set of conditions that he has either preset or the machines make a necessity. The results are photos of folds and random colors and can be striking and lovely. For his x-ray photographs, Beshty walks film through an airport x-ray machine, exposing the film and determining partially the later outcome of the printing. Then there are the box works, where Beshty sends a cube or triangle of glass in the mail. Fed Ex handles the box as they would any other box. The glass cracks and sometimes breaks. This determined thing is subsequently displayed, a literal “handled” record of its travels around the world.
And so you calmed their stillness
Loving “objects” sometimes feels a little wrong to me, because they are not people, not living. It’s “materialistic.” But you know what? I love how this dress makes me feel. The look of it, the feel of the material, the swishing of the skirt, the open back, the fit on my body. I love it. I love where I got the dress: a second hand store in Brattleboro on one of our trips to the hospital there for Mama’s appointments.
I was admitted at around 3:30 PM. Holden was born at 11:26 PM. It was a lot of work but he was well worth every minute.
As I watched, however, the patterns remained dim and muted. They were indeed there, but it was clear to me that I was not being presented with the full show! This was the first time I began to realize that someone else was talking to me within the vision space. I had the distinct impression, then a certainty, that Ayahuasca was saying to me, “Yes, the patterns are there. There they are, but you don’t need to see them. They are not important for you.”
Van Til’s first concern was Barth’s assertion that the Word of God could not be directly identified either with the history of Jesus nor the scriptures, seeing scripture as only an indirectly revelation from God. Van Til wrote, “The question between Barth and historic Christianity is that of the reality of the identification of God’s revelation in history. When Barth answers his question with a resounding NO, orthodox theology answers it with a resounding YES.”
The old Apple G4 mirror door Dual Core 1 gig was getting tired after running nearly 24/7 for 7 or 8 years. A faithful machine, but as many know the software tends to outstrip the hardware before too long.
Your coveralls and my denim jacket
Announcing the NEW Cricut Expression 2 !
Mattias looked out onto the sea as a smile spread across his face. "Liberation." his head nodded as he looked for how to explain it, "Do you remember what we were talking about before the attack?"
M: Love pours in so many colors,
Cupid flew into a pure rage. Seeing his twin eaten by this majestic creature, he became so inflamed that his vision clouded over in shades of red. Red tears soaked the earth as swooped in and gutted the monk, who dropped both the arrow and his brother's still convulsing lower half.
So, next time you stub your toe, fall down the stairs or are in need of some cheering up, F away ’til your heart’s content.
There were live shows in a tank, where dolphins arched wildly into the air in a blast of white spray. Or you could beat yourself senseless on the Sea Ram bumper cars. Matt loved the Whirl Pool, a wooden centrifuge that spun madly as the floor dropped out and the g-forces pinned your body to the wall. It only made me seasick for the entire day.
As the school year draws to a close and graduation looms, like many of my peers I have reflected about my time at the University of Idaho and about what I’ll take with me when I leave Moscow.
Please email me at khasheck@gmail.com to help you get in touch with the sponsors to get your prizes, and take your "I was a winner" blog badge from the side of this blog for your blog.
Not sure what I will do next week, but I haven’t been to the grocery store in over a week. Will come up with something.
Okay, I’m not trying to say that my musings will ever rank with Pepys’s musings in importance, especially not in an age in which anyone with a computer can deliver a diary, can jot down a journal, can breech the blogosphere . . . sorry, got a bit carried away . . . although if I recall correctly, Pepsy did spend an inordinate amount of time in coffee and ale houses. I suppose I’m just trying to say that this entry is akin to Samuel noting that he bought fresh cod at the piers—he ate fish, and I have tumbleweeds.
I started by partially diecutting the butterfly and leaves along where the fold of the card would be. (I die cut them before folding the card by using a 4.25"x5.5" piece of cardstock as a guide to know where the fold would be). By partially diecutting them BEFORE folding the card, you won't have fold lines going through those images that "pop" above the card. After diecutting, I stamped the images. I added some flowers and colored the butterflies. One of the little butterflies is popped up with foam tape. Hard to believe this is a one layer card. . .well, unless you consider the popped up butterfly a second layer. :)
There was just time for a short amble around the shopping centre, and then to the bus stop. The bus was ten minutes late. This wouldn't have mattered, but then there was an accident of some sort on the dual carriageway, which slowed all the traffic down to a crawl. After that, the driver went as fast as he could, but we were back to sweating and wondering if we'd make it to Brecon in time again.
Locations And Subsidiaries 17
Continues in the form of
Simply awe. At life, at humans, at the planet Earth, at the thing we call brain, at everything that I have around me. And I’m sad. Sad because the second story has such a strong sad ending it permeates through to the beginning, even though I haven’t written those tens of thousands of words in between. Sad, yet hopeful and happy. It is such a confusing feeling that I had to share it with the world. Have you ever had this same double-feeling? for no reason at all? Just because of the thoughts you thought?
XTC Senses working overtime UK
that was taken at "family day" for the hot shot crew.
Barbara Washington of Magic Delights created three wonderful vintage postcards! I love the vintage color and the spatters, and the mix of images is wonderful! I love that executioner stamp in the upper left corner, I think this is his first design team appearance and it is another IndigoBlu exclusive!
Finally we have our winner of the Spellbinders Witches Brew die cuts, chosen using Random.org . . .
will unfold like unlaced fingers
Hello peeps.
In contrast, equiluxes are the days when sunrise and sunset are precisely twelve hours apart. This day is usually close to the date of the equinox, but varies according to latitude.
Ok, ok...I know I've been talking about cookies a lot lately. I mean, it's no secret that I love cookies. Anyone who has seen my Pinterest recipe board (or my waistline) can attest to this. So, when I noticed a group of bloggers talking about a #cookieswap on Twitter, I was immediately interested. I was a little nervous about participating since I'd never really baked before but I'm so glad that I decided to sign up!
Sisters of Mercy Nine while nine UK
A. He Controls The Weather vs. 8
Governors Babangida Aliyu and Rabiu Kwakwanso of Niger and Kano respectively deserve commendations because they have refused to accept Boko Haram insurgents hanging around their political space. Part of the attacks on these two states was to hit back at the intransigence of the duo over what others are condoning.
The kittens haven’t been featured in the blog for a long time, and today seems like a good time to mention them. They’ve all grown quite a bit, but still aren’t weaned. Cairo is the biggest, as I knew he would be. Their pretty blue eyes aren’t blue anymore, but still pretty.
I was pleasantly surprised when we got there, being on the borders between England & Wales, the town perched on a cliff above the river Teme ,is steeped in history with castle ruins and many beautiful old buildings.
Madeleine disappeared from her family’s holiday apartment in Praia da Luz, Portugal, on May 3, 2007, days before her fourth birthday.
Soak shrimp for 15-30 minutes in the mixture in the refrigerator. Discard marinade.
Cast your mind back two months. Remember when right-wing millionaire bloviator Rush Limbaugh attacked a law student for speaking facts when invited to a Congressional hearing? Limbaugh grossly misrepresented the situation and avoided any factual information in his character assassination of Sandra Fluke: he called her a slut, said she wanted Federal money so she could be promiscuous, and demanded that she post sex videos online so he could see what he was paying for. When reasonable people expressed concern, rising to outrage, at his behavior, he doubled down, spending three days of broadcasts generating further lies and more hysterical behavior. Fortunately, Fluke stood her ground, public pressure cost Rush advertisers, and his eventual non-apology was too little too late. What’s telling, however, is that he thought he could use his bully platform to say whatever he wanted, shaping reality to his own ends, and suffer no consequences.
I thought the best way to reach you would be via email. I acknowledge it is a little unorthodox. The message would be appropriate for this. It has been a month since we last talked. The last time we talked was Easter Sunday.
Well...did the old one paradigm bite? Build a new one. All the phenomena you based the old one on is still there, you just have to recombine it and probably throw out a lot of stuff. This is an important point. Subtraction is a part of creation.
The summer's gone, and all the flowers are dying
As you probably know if you tried this rules, the game goes real quick. The dice pool expenditure is vital and the battle last about as much as a real match would last. At least when you only play 1 fighter.
Blank dazed unresponsive expressions from the whole party - another day, another cutprice Travelinn (£19 the room!) reached by satnav on another identical industrial park or service area of another motorway.
The Graveyard Book was no exception. I talked myself out of buying it when it first hit the shelves, though I desperately wanted to read it. It sounded amazing. A little boy, raised by ghosts in a graveyard... and the opening line was perfect - "There was a hand in the darkness, and it held a knife." But a little voice inside of me unreasonably whispered for me to leave it alone. And so I did. For many years.
"Maybe give it five more minutes and then pop home again," I said. I was relieved when he nodded, not saying 'oh, there's no-one there'. We looked at each other for another long moment before I smiled, wished him luck and walked away. Feeling like a heel.
The first character in this story is a black steer. He was born here last spring and wore a blue ear tag in his left ear with the ID 027. He was raised here, fed here, and then sorted out and taken to the local locker to be cut into smaller packages to put in my freezer.
Does Nato not have enemies for gods sake that could benefit from helping Libya at this moment in time and thus halting the imperialists from the killing of Islam in their wars.
- Disillusioned, Middle England, 10/3/2012 19:25
After getting Nathan and Mark out the door this morning, I opened my computer and went to Gracie's CaringBridge site to see how she was doing. What I found made my heart weep and I couldn't breathe.
We do get a glimpse of religious difference in each of the successive wedding plans, as the couple repeatedly approach and then back off from tying the knot. In the first wedding planning session with all four parents and a clergy member representing each side, the Jews announce that the men will wear yarmulkes, and the Christians counter with a plan to have communion at the wedding. Interfaith lesson #1: passive-aggression, willful religious ignorance and hardline negotiation are not effective interfaith communication skills. The wedding plan falls through.
I didn't take pictures of the process (bad blogger I know) but I can walk you through it. We picked up these white picture frames from Ross. The letters came from Michaels Craft Store, you can also get the from JoAnns or Hobby Lobby. We had to go to 5 Michaels stores to get all the letters, make sure you have all the letters before you start as some might be hard to find.
To raise awareness for National Down Syndrome Awareness day, which is later this month on the 21st, an awesome friend of mine made this beautiful video of her twin girls, one of which has down syndrome. Laurel and Ellie are two of the most wonderful little girls that you'd ever have the privilege of knowing so please, click "play" and watch it. Because as Dr. Seuss would say (had to slip something in for his birthday), "Unless someone like you cares a whole awful lot, nothing is going to get better. It's not." - The Lorax.
So, instead of kicking people out who disagree or offend, we love them back into the group. One of the greatest offenses that Christianity has committed against a dying and lost world is that we have systematically removed ourselves from society by segregating ourselves, and by kicking out anyone who doesn’t fit the mold. If we follow the model of Jesus then we will draw people to us. Without compromising Truth, we can at the same time not compromise Love. Our witness to the world consists in our being the type of Christians who the watching world will see and say, “Wow…look at how they love…I need some of that!” Instead I’m afraid that they know us by who and what we oppose. When Jesus ascended into heaven he left us one final legacy. He said that the world would know we are his and that he was sent by God if we love one another. At one time the Roman historian Tertullian said, “See how these Christians love one another!” When you ask someone today what they think of when they think of Christians, that is not the first answer you will get!
I do not weep for what's not true
Now, that sounds easy right?Well, that was all after 2 years of working as a temp, doing every acting gig I could find – usually for no pay, borrowing money to buy a new engine for my car and wearing a pair of shoes with a hole in them because I couldn’t afford anything else.Did I mention my living room curtain was made from a torn bed sheet?It was another 3 years before I got my first speaking part on a TV show.That show was Spin City.(I played a waitress in a scene where the girl playing Charlie Sheens crazy date threw bread at me.)
So what exactly is the point of this blog post other than to talk about breasts?
What have y'all been up to?
Then along came Left Behind and a few other books I have read along that genre. It really made sense to me. I had never really thought much about the “rapture” and all that would happen afterwards. I read the words years ago but never studied them or knew their true meaning. Also, I have always been troubled about what would happen to all those good people on earth who believe in their own God, like Buddha and Allah etc. And the Jewish faith, who is still waiting for their Messiah. Is it really true that they cannot go to heaven because they don’t believe in Jesus? Do they go to their own heaven? Or are they “left behind”, and become true believers during the Tribulation?
“I have to give credit where credit is due and stress that the truffled creamed spinach is easily the best creamed spinach I have ever had. I challenge any human being walking this earth to serve me a better creamed spinach.”–James L.
Even as a teenager I remember thinking the lyrics were retarded. Still it holds together at least as much the other dumb ass bands featured on this blog. They lose points for the Skrewdriver shirt and white headband the bass player's wearing but they make up for it by prominently featuring the water heater in the background of the cover photo.
Here's a sampling of some more SXSW artists in today's volume of B-KRAP:
This 2011 piece is nicely hidden away off Bethnal Green Road, but on the same street as some pretty average pieces, which only makes this even better. As always art pickers, find it for yourself, do a little mooching.
On Thursday, Tatay suffered from a mild stroke. When I visited the hospital on Monday, Tatay was recovering and Nanay was quite cheerful, even joking when Tatay drank coconut water with a straw. Aba, asensado na si Endong.
I suspect that the voices of self-doubt always waiting, right below the surface, will pop their silly heads up again and again, to say with smirks that there's no way I can write a whole book, there's no way anyone will be interested in what I have to say, there's no way I can get away with this idea … there's no way … there's no way …
You weren't initiated on soft butterfly flutters..........
*UPDATE: In the comments, Mr. Gannon corrects me, pointing out that it wasn't, after all, a Christmas card, and provides the full text of the card. And with that, the whole thing makes less sense than ever! Yay!
This email arrived from a would be suitor today…
The training is a unique online experience for youth pastors, injected with the type of networking that only happens when a group of youth pastors get together to talk and pray about what only youth pastors understand. Register now to get the tools and support you’ve been looking for.
Remaining a perpetual possibility
Today the CEO has reversed that controversial stance after two Facebook pages attracted thousands vowing to ban the company and seeking his resignation.
Kadence is growing like a weed. She still wants me to pick her up, but she's just too big! So instead we settle on her snuggling with me on my lap. :) She only has 3 days left of Kindergarten! I cannot believe that the year is already over. Soon my baby will be a first grader! I was so nervous about sending her to school, and being apart from her all day long when the year began. But we adjusted, and she absolutely loves school. She has grown so much this year! A much more mature, taller little girl is walking out my door every morning on her way to the school bus. It's so much fun watching her grow. Oh, and she has 2 fewer teeth since the last time I posted. ;o)
Verizon Wireless is set to expand its recently unveiled HomeFusion Broadband offering nationwide beginning tomorrow. The service relies on the carrier’s LTE network and was initially announced earlier this year.
13 royal
In college, I struggled with an eating disorder (anorexia, not because I wanted to be skinny, but because I had an issue with food, it’s a whole different story). Then, I got married after my sophomore year (I was only 19, I know, SUPER young). 6 months later, I got pregnant with my son (eating disorder conquered!). Gained 65 lbs. When he was 3 months old, I weighed 195-200 lbs and found myself pregnant again, this time with a girl. Lost 20 lbs because of horrible morning sickness, gained 30 back. A total of 10 lbs. When she was about 8 months old, I weighed in at 165 lbs.
convinced of His unfeigned and unconditional love towards you.
So they can catch me in my tears.
A divorce is not just the dissolution of a marriage, it is taking a life that you have built together and separating it forever. If there are kids involved it is even harder. I wish I could just walk away with what I came into this with, but I have kids to support. I have to put a roof over their heads, clothes on their backs and food in their stomachs and that costs money. So why don't I go to work? Good question! I would love to, but right now it is not possible...unless someone wants to watch my kids this summer for free???? (just kidding)
From here we hopped onto a thin metal boat and with the oarsmen at the back using his feet to ‘run’ on the paddles and an extra paddler girl and me and Steve on the opposite side we headed up steam. It was a lovely way to travel through this magnificent scenery, with rice paddies either side and huge limestone monoliths towering above us we went through a series of caves only a meter or two high to emerge on the other side to be greeted by some more spectacular scenery! As we passed other boats they all had a good laugh as me and jack sat in the front made us nose dive a little and we were taking water on board, at one point a Vietnamese girl laughed so hard she almost fell in, so we had a good revenge laugh haha! The river trip and mountains were spectacular, quite similar to Ha Long bay in appearance but the closeness made them seem even more impressive and the mode of transport seemed more rustic and exciting!
Many patients under an Express Scripts plan have used Walgreens pharmacies for years and have personal relationships with their Walgreens pharmacist. Walgreens has made a national effort to make this transition as smooth as possible and is doing all they can to help patients continue to use Walgreens when possible, or take care of them as they are forced to leave in order to use their in-network coverage. Express Scripts wants customers to use their own mail order pharmacy business instead of their community pharmacy whenever possible. This could threaten all community drugstores in your area!
(innerfrontier.org)
After a lengthy discussion, we toured the grounds, starting at the Connections Tent. The Guineans immediately spotted the sweet grass baskets as well as the similar African baskets of woven grass brought here from Senegal by anthropologist Debbi Mack. Mr. Fall told us that these baskets are still made and used in Guinea for a variety of purposes, including as fanner baskets for rice. They also recognized a mortar and pestle reproduction that we use for demonstrating hand milling of rice. The Guineans said that these methods are still used in rural villages today, though they use two slightly different versions than ours. One has a wider mouth and was used for the removal of the husk from the kernel, while the second, with a more narrow mouth, was used to remove the bran.
more to do with the hops and cannabis than their actual age.
There are plenty of smart, reasonable people working in digital media who do not make preposterous assertions; who do not think that social media is the answer to every question; who do not speak in the dreadful, impenetrable language of digi-drivel.
G Bananas
viṣṇor yat paramaṁ padam
Whinberry & Antler products are also part of an exhibition organised by local wildlife artist, Rory McCann. The xhibition is on for one month at the Shropshire Wildlife Trust Centre. You can find out more details by following the link;
Knit a few more rows on ds' scarf.
$$ ÷ #people = $ per person
These are the most important things that I have learned from my short time in the athletic community.
It doesn’t happen immediately but given time, it does happen.
This morning I came across "Some Rules for Students and Teachers" written by John Cage. I immediately got excited about a few of them. For example:
4) The School at the Chalet by Elinor M Brent-Dyer. The school saga to end all school sagas, a riot of gymslips, japes, 1920s slang, alternate days spent speaking French, English and German and at least one near-fatality per term via avalanches, floods and frozen lakes. This first episode introduces a group of girls who, living through a series of 50+ titles, prove unable ever after to form adult relationships, instead remaining 'a Chalet girl for ever'. They didn't have break; they had 'Kaffee und Kuchen', and the school washrooms were called 'splasheries'. So glamorous. I was very disappointed, when I got to boarding school, to find that the beds were not all cubicled off with 'gay cretonne curtains'.
if it must, these things are important not because a
“As much as Ron may think otherwise, gays do not choose to be gay,” they wrote in a letter to Osborne and chancellor Harvey Perlman. “Gays can be raised in the ‘perfect’ family environment with parents active and nurturing, raised in the church to become lovers of the scripture. They are Christians — Brett is such an example.”
the Cuban government for Mr. Gross’ release so he can return to his
The green egg yolk occurs when the eggs are over cooked so always time the eggs when they are cooking.
Another issue that gives me serious pause is how cavalier The Doctor is at manipulating someone’s past for a specific result. This seems to fly in the face of certain “rules” of the show as established by David Whitaker and altered, but still largely upheld, by Denis Spooner (and other script editors of the show). It has always been a tenuous rule that The Doctor cannot meddle in established Earth history (read: our history) except to set right what went wrong, but he can meddle in Earth’s future and the histories of other planets. However, when he meddled in the future and histories of other planets, we are to never explicitly point out that this is what he is doing, changing history, just someone else’s history. In A Christmas Carol, and much of Series 5, we are told time can be re-written, and this episode goes a long way to illustrate it. In the pre-Deadly Assassins view of The Time Lords, preventing this type of meddling is one of the major functions of The Time Lords. Without The Time Lords, New Who has had to establish certain natural correctives for the universe. Thus, we have The Reapers in Father’s Day. We have Adelaide commit suicide in Waters of Mars. And while these episodes did create very small changes from the original timeline (as did The Aztecs, where the non-interference rule was first stated), these changes seem very personal and very inconsequential. But the general theme of not changing established events is upheld. No more. The rule looks to be dead. The only question I have: To what end has Moffat dispensed with the rule? Is he re-writing Doctor Who to suit his particular story-telling devices (with a large emphasis on time travel and manipulation) or is he setting The Eleventh Doctor up for a great, catastrophic fall. If the latter, I may find the journey worth it, if the former, I may look on The Moffat era as a collection of good stories that ultimately killed Doctor Who. Okay, so maybe that is a bit of an exaggeration, but a rule cannot be broken without consequences, and breaking a rule as big as this needs to have severe consequences. I don’t think we have seen that yet. At least when The Seventh Doctor would break the rule, we are given the impression that he took a lot of time and care to limit the damage. That he would follow the changes and alter other histories to establish the minimal amount of change to the overall timeline. While this is breaking the non-meddling rule, it is showing that there are distinct consequences to breaking it and that you must exercise a large amount of caution and put a great deal of work and thought into the change. You cannot be flippant about it, which The Eleventh Doctor is.
The fact that it takes place in the late Victorian era helps a lot with scary points. No electricity, no phones, no bridges and above all… no ghost-hunters. With the aid of candles and stupidity Arthur (Radcliffe) starts to unravel a deadly tale of insanity, murder and disaster.
5. Burger King Chicken Fry
Year by year, my fleet of die-cast cars expanded rapidly. By the time I was ten, it had grown to epic proportions, boasting of fifty-odd little vehicles. R/C cars, push-back, cars whose doors and even hoods could open, you name it. Guys at Mattel Inc. would’ve made a huge fortune, thanks to my swanky Hot Wheels collection. Every make had a healthy representation, with Maruti Suzuki in the lead (it’s the biggest car manufacturer in India, mind you. They make the most fuel-efficient cars and released a series of TV adverts about this, here’s one). I’m just too obsessed with cars, you see.
1. Supplemental income. For me its used to pay off my credit card debt, which I am merely 90 days away from! But for you, add it to your own areas in your budget where you seem to need it. Whether you over spent in an area last month, foresee an expense in the near future, or there is just simply something you are dying to buy or spend money on that is currently out of your budget range, these shops can give yourself a little extra cha-ching! when needed.
Is it against this factual background, outrageous or beyond imagination, that recently a witness has come forward claiming –from first hand- that Friso was present at a satanic execution of a young woman in the province of Friesland in the night after queens day in 1999?
Not being able to do a variety of things and the fear of looking like you don't do enough leads some kids to sign up to do too much then to hardly do any of it. Coaches and leaders of groups know who the kids are that never attend even 50% of the time. Those are the transcript padders. They help fuel this problem!
Three times in this book of Acts, we read of this same incident. They are here, in Acts 9:4-5, and again in Acts 26:14-15. This shows the importance God places on the incident. It is doubly emphasised. It is important because it gives us a picture of the nation Israel in their rejection of Jesus Christ and God in particular. It also gives us an example of the mercy of God in saving the chief of sinners and making him the apostle of the Gentiles.
I'm also enrolled (with hubby) to do our Cert IV's in Workplace Training and Assesment. A must have these days if you want to work as a trainer and assesor in your workplace. Online for next 12 months ... AND ... I'm doing a Management Development course end March through work.
Hey there all you lovely people! It’s been a bit since i’ve blogged! I’ve been working ultra hard this week, and i feel privelaged this week to bring you things from the Beauty Fair! The Beauty Fair opened today (May 1st) featuring, Chelle, Boom, Pididdle, A.E.Meth, Izzies, TSG, Mons, to just name a few, its alot of great beauty products the awesome desingers have featured here. I was given the awesome responsibility to blog some items.
For thou art a girl as much brighter than her
Two observations offer themselves at the outset: a) Muslims engaged in politically-motivated violence seem to have virtually no psychological barriers to the mass killing of civilians, and b) British paramilitaries will be in a position much closer to that of the loyalist paramilitaries during the Troubles than the republican paramilitaries, and must therefore be expected to be exposed to a similar set of incentives and pressures with respect to their own violent activities. Taken together, these two factors make it highly probable that any prolonged conflict between British and Muslim paramilitaries will descend, perhaps quickly, into the outright indiscriminate killing of those perceived to be on the other side.
Anyhoo! I had a wonderful time and want to run away and live in the woods forever.
Again, put aside the homes and ask, “Why aren’t their more jobs for Americans?”
Some believe that the cost of organic cosmetics is greater
"With Afghanistan, Iraq, and significant security commitments around the
Lots and lots of options and choices. Savory, like chicken pot pie, or sweet, like pumpkin pie. Crusts made of pastry, or of cookie crumbs, or of graham crackers.
This calculation demonstrates that the Antichrist cannot reveal his true identity on December 21, 2012 because it would be at odds with the designation of when the End Times will end after adding 1260 days from the halfway point of the seventieth week of Daniel. In addition, the seventieth week of Daniel would have to begin on July 10, 2009 for December 21, 2012 to be the halfway point. Recall, the seventieth week of Daniel is initiated with the confirming of a (new) seven year treaty between Antichrist and Israel. There was no such announcement on July 10, 2009 as Israel was not negotiating with the Palestinians.
Neither will many disagree with the assumption that the next five years will not be the same as the last five. The church does not stand still. Times chahge and people, who comprise the church, also change. Events in society around us inevitably impact upon the church. What we are also unable to forecast are the unexpected novelties of the devils schemes or the extraordinary works of the sovereign Spirit of God.
The final twenty minutes are appalling, sorrowful and disorienting. They are triumphant. Finally realising who she is and what she has done to herself, she calmly sits in her dressing room and puts on her make-up. Sadness and relief hiccup out of her and tranquility washes over her eyes. It is magical, as miraculous and spellbinding as her final transformation. By becoming lost in her role, she has found herself.
This is my latest Art Class Homework piece in Acrylics. I was given an old Barclays Bank advertisement to copy. When the other students saw what I had been given there was a lot of grimacing going on I can tell you. Being fair minded I offered to swop with them but strangely enough nobody wanted to............. This has to be the most difficult painting have ever done, so please be kind to me and don't judge too harshly as am sure when my tutor sees it there will be enough harsh comments to last me a lifetime.............lol
But what if you want to say something to a person but don’t want the whole world to see it? That’s when you use the direct message, or DM. Again, there’s more than one way to do this. You can type by hand:
How to use Zotero for research and collaboration:
